1/2 cup grated Parmesan cheese
The only access to the garden is through a gate situated at the point of the fork, giving onto rue Commaille.
I have also started a hypo-allergenic cleanse under the direction of my naturopath, which I will discuss in more depth later. I have noticed a significant improvement with how I feel during and after my runs which I am attributing to the heavily cleaned-up diet.
Alfred Hitchcock is one of those Hollywood types whose films can be associated with various types of creative work. Thrillers are probably what he’s best known for as, over the years, Hitch cranked out many excellent films with espionage, murder and other general all-around mayhem as the main component to their plots. Hitchcock even frequently discussed his use of the MacGuffin, put simply, whatever it was the protagonists were fighting over, be that secret plans or, typically in his films, some vague, unspecified crucial thing that sets up all the thriller elements.
I really don’t feel any differently about trading in this way than I do about investing in mutual fund, stocks, whatever. If you put in $100 today and price drops 15%, you ride it out for the longer term. I do the same thing. Just because it’s “trading” doesn’t mean I don’t hold positions for as long as I need to. So, when Brazil does this or China does that and gold drops $50/oz, then it’s not a big deal. Now, if it drops another $50, then another $50, then another $50, at some point it obviously becomes a bigger deal.
Rowland Howarth - Drums
The man has been freed on police bail to return to a police station in May, pending further inquiries and the woman was released without charge.
at the details about each of them.
Much to my surprise, my husband has developed a love of Feta cheese after I first introduced it to him on a Greek salad a few weeks ago. I also found a jar of Kalamata olives that was on sale and small enough to make trying them for the first time not such an investment, and he loves those too. They are marinated in a Napa Valley Cabernet Sauvignon, olive oil and a blend of herbs, and I have to agree with him, they are really delicious.
i participate in the current reality io to change it to a better working or io to change the mind charts, if that’s all that it takes & the change of reality is not necessary
In short the trip had everything. From stunning views and limited release brews to bargain hunting and Bogan spotting – we even had real beer tears and lost a couple of our number along the way.
Welcome, and may God grant you wisdom and discernment as you consider all of these things.
Derek invited us to imagine how in tune with technology that child will be, by the time she is a teenager. Community groups will need to adapt, if we hope to engage her, at that age.
And Dog was happy. . . . .
And, thus, the answer to #8 will give you a general idea of how much time per day you should spend cold calling. I generally cold call until I’ve hit my cold calling goals (number of cold calls not including those that don’t answer), but some people set daily cold calling goals based on the number of leads they generate (I’m not stopping until I get 10 leads), or based on the number of x-dates they receive. However you want to do it is fine, just make sure you have a goal and you stick to it!
The frontier of loss
"Hi Lucy
“As a longtime local history enthusiast, I have enjoyed the bits of old-time information that appear in your publication. The recent image of the ice house triggered memories of ice skating and of ice houses. When I was a boy, my Uncle Benny lived next to us on the good old unpolluted Patuxent River. We had a nice little pond, and Uncle Benny had the ice house. It was a hole dug in sandy ground, very close to the local dirt road, with good shade from several paradise trees after noon. It was about eight feet deep and eight feet wide, and the interior was lined with mostly Virginia pine and some white oak slabs. It had a homemade ladder and an A-line roof with wooden shingles. Straw provided insulation.”
6. Auditing of accounts is made difficult when officials of the Party leave and do not hand over Petty Cash Books or other Party property, in some cases a deliberate ploy in an attempt to embarrass the Party.
Sometimes, we just need to go a little bigger.
Everything's been good to me. Some people suck but that's just life. Teenage life. With all of the dramas. Hahaha. I'm 17 now so I should be more mature but it's so hard! But I will try as hard as I can. Time to grow up! I'm surrounded by people who are mostly older than me (20 something) and sometimes I'm ashamed of my childishness. But it's good that I have people to look up to :)
When they wheeled him on stage he looked like Falstaff and Orson Welles' love child. His right leg ended in a swaying wizard's sleeve of trouser leg while his left encompassed a straining thigh with a little white-socked stubby foot dangling from the cuff. With the white beard and fat face I thought he'd make a great Santa. I feared the worst - especially when he spoke, Most of it was unintelligible to normal ears. Broad cockney with sudden bursts of Glaswegian - semaphore may have helped. His bloated face was wreathed in smiles though when he strapped on a gorgeous Les Paul and launched into the whole of the Grace and Danger album.
The famed attorney, Alan Dershowitz was asked on a MSNBC segment what he thought of the case and he expressed the view that the indictment was of dubious merit. That brings me back to my initial reaction to Angela Corey’s self-aggrandizing decision and performance.
You have to be a follower - sorry but that's only fair to my readers. But otherwise, you're going to help me come up with a superhero story. Why? Because I'm a nerd, and it's my blog and...that's why.
Likely result: Watches more television.
At anchor we really don’t want to have to run the engine for charging, so solar power is in our future. We need to be able to stay on top of our daily usage at anchor, so we need about 100 amp hours of solar.
And the bonus is, with a nice loaf, you'll have something to snack on for days afterward!
What makes this book so valuable? Is it because the lead author, Dr. Maxwell Leigh Eidenoff, was part of the Atomic Bomb Project at Columbia University and the University of Chicago?
I teach Disability Studies at the University of Victoria. I include people with disabilities (some of whom are my friends) as presenters in several classes for this course. Some of my students also have disabilities or have family members with disabilities.
She puts the bag down onto the tray as I just shake my head and sigh, wondering what this world is coming to.
Here’s how you can help:
Hmm, I guess at that age you dont have a car backseat
41. In a study by the University of Chicago in 1907, it was concluded that the easiest colour to spot is yellow. This is why John Hertz, who is the founder of the Yellow Cab Company picked cabs to be yellow.
Soon I was hungry again and began looking for a suitable place to stop. Almost every small village in Karnataka has at least one small shop selling chai, idli-vada-sambar, sometimes even afternoon meals and we cyclists rely on these for our nourishment. So in the next village I stopped at the place and asked if he had food or snacks/ breakfast, oota-tindi sikta? It was 8:30am and I’d come about 135k. He said he had idlis and surprised me with tatthe idlis, which are flattened disc shaped. Doused in sambar and chutney and washed down with two cups of sweet chaia, they make for an excellent meal. And it all came to 18 bucks.
Cowboy Dan by The Ditchbank Okies
Lots of business people are not convinced about climate change.
John Gordon
I think the desire of certain people to remove every incentive and capacity for men to perform as husbands and fathers – and then to nevertheless demand they marry and take on the traditional roles of men anyway without incentives or capacities - is the height of narcissism. Men are people too – we are not inanimate objects. We are not sperm donors and wallets. And if society decides to go in a direction where the traditional roles of men are replaced with government social programs funded by high taxes and deficit spending, then marriage will die in this society.
Where the Greek word EKKLESIA refers to God’s Church, it does not refer to an assembly room or meeting place, but to a company of people; for the word EKKLESIA means CALLED OUT. Therefore, God’s Church, God’s Ekklesia, during this Dispensation of Grace, or the Dispensation of the Mystery, is composed of believers, or saints, whom God by the Holy Spirit and the Gospel of Christ has called out of this condemned world to be joined to Christ, as one flesh, to make up the one new man of Ephesians 2:15 and Ephesians 5:31-32.
So I finished reading all the documentation on the hCG diet...tomorrow will be a very interesting day. I should be OK if I can just make it through the first three days! :)
I began by saying that the gay and lesbian community will not let me ignore the issue of gay marriage. This holds true as well for the majority of the population which is overwhelmingly heterosexual and must contend with the issue.
I like the airline’s strategy and marketing stance, they produce very reserved advertising campaigns, focussing on their service and product offerings in a quiet and restrained way, their cabins & liveries aren’t ostentatious (unlike it’s rival Emirates) and the airline generates a lot of interest and respect within their industry. I look forward to seeing how this airline grows.
And, lastly, to all those craft brewers out there who have kept my fridge full and my mouth happy, a huge thank you. I hope that this blog has helped to spread the word about the types and styles and brands of good beer that are out there and that some of you have been encouraged to try some of the same as a result of these pages. Keep supporting the blokes who are getting some terrific brews out into the market and support the blokes like Cloudwine, Purvis and Sword’s Select who are retailing and showcasing these beers.
3) The Twilight Zone Collection:
We want more
STUDIO: Warner Brothers
Speaking of Hal – the growing friendship with Tom and banter with Allison as well, I’m rather pleased that they’re exploring his love life at last. We got lucky once again because Alex was a rather sparky character and while Hal did make the effort to resist killing her, it does appear from next week’s promo that Hal might start succumbing to his dark side again.
So now we have a post with babies and food, which pretty much sums up the highlights of my weekend.
Day 11 expenses
A big “shout out” goes to my fellow radio host Tanya Mercado. She has a wonderful program “Raise Your Glass” on Friday nights (NDB Media of course). Each week is a thoughtful discussion on a different life lesson. Tanya also co-hosts “The Five Tool” show.
what I was once, too.
3.) I would like her shipped by some method that can be tracked! Do not just stick her in a box and send her U.S. Mail... I would like her to travel in either the big BROWN truck or the Federal Express truck! (or plane)
Hope you all have a wonderful week and thanks for all your continued sweet comments:)
After recently finding myself unemployed, I've been trying to save money on food while trying to keep things tasty and healthy. My local supermarket does a Basics range, which can be a lot cheaper than their usual range or brand name products. For those British readers out there, I thought I'd write a bit of a review of the Basics products I've tried.
March 2013 will see the release of an as yet unannounced 5th Expansion Pack, although there is no mention of any details for this, but you can be sure if we get any news we will share it with you.
A couple of other friends convinced me to give beets a try, and I am so glad that I did. One of my current favorite sides for meatloaf is Roasted Potatoes and Beets. Conventional methods for roasting beets leave them whole until after cooking, but I peel and cube the beets to roughly the same size as my potatoes. The red beets stain my tender, buttery Yukon Gold potatoes a little pink as I toss them together with the olive oil and seasonings, and both crisp on the outside with an almost caramelized crust. Hubs dips his in the ketchup along side the meatloaf. I like a dollop of sour cream and an extra grind of fresh cracked black pepper. Either way, I don't want beets to beat it. I want Roasted Potatoes and Beets to come around On My Plate.
Since then the house has undergone an upgrade. The windows have been replaced (the old ones were single glazed metal frames and were very draughty, and the building has been clad to improve the insulation.
The route now enters the National Trust’s Box Hill Estate, 94 hectares of which were purchased for and donated to The Trust in 1914 by Leopold Salomons, the owner of nearby Norbury Park which I shall pass through later. Box Hill itself has been a notable landmark for many years; in 1655 John Evelyn wrote:
Sheikh Sayeed made the comments in an interview with the blog The Samosa, before reiterating them later when contacted by The Independent.
2. Renard says he doesn’t want Nick to be on “the other side.” What does that mean? What side is he on? Good/bad?
This is a bit discombobulated, maybe I shouldn’t post this?
(Outtakes 1968-69 / Band of Gypsys Rehearsals, Baggy's, New York City, NY 18-19.12.69)
So far, it’s not clear why any of these individuals have been arrested. No announcements have yet been made by the CNRDRE. Interim President Dioncounda Traoré, for his part, seems not to have been informed of the arrests in advance.
"Bob, what airline you wanna take?"
Your feel-good forward du jour, courtesy of my mother:
What I love so much about this entire line is that it provides comfort while staying stylish. Every item I received was soft and light weight. Exactly what I would want to put on my daughter on a hot summer day to keep her cool and comfortable. But while they're comfy and light they are also full of color, shape, and style.
The name is apt. This beer has big flavor, aroma, and at 9.6%abv, strength.
6 eggs, lightly beaten
you been tattooing, Miss Thorn?”
Stewart wants to take everything on the beach, except for the piano because it would have been too much of a burden to carry. Ada insists on taking the piano with them. It is her only prized possession. It is her way of communicating what she is feeling to the world. Eventually, she realizes that she has to leave the piano behind for the time being.
Have you encountered a teaching of Jesus that you find hard to understand? Don’t walk away. Seek the help of the Holy Spirit and mature Christians to help you understand.
Do you know how hard it is to take a criticism delivered in a sh*tty way when you are a comedian by a man who is under 4’ tall!!!!!!! Do you have any idea the amount of restraint it takes for a comedian in this position to hold back? It was difficult, oh, so, difficult.
1 flipping
She is easy to worm and vaccinate and is up to date on all that. She is a really good mom and will mother other foals as well (no nursing, just care). She is sorrel with no socks and a white stripe. She also carries the rabicano gene and so has roaning through her flanks and on her tail. She is timid in the herd but knows how to take care of herself, she rarely has a bite or scratch on her.
'Tempest' is a time-travelling romantic action-adventure which will probably be read by most people in one sitting because it's so compulsively good that you won't be able to put it down! It's the debut novel from Julie Cross who's an exciting new writing talent and is the first in a trilogy which I'm thrilled about because I want more...now! There's been a lot of buzz surrounding the release of 'Tempest' and the film rights have already been optioned by Summit Entertainment, the company behind the Twilight Saga.
After work, I drive my NHTSA car back home on the DOT roads, to my house which has not burned down in my absence because of the state and local building codes and fire marshal's inspection, and which has not been plundered of all it's valuables thanks to the local police department.
Temperatures can be as hot as 160 degrees or as frigid as 25 degrees below zero, but in between — in the land of constant sunrise — it would be "shirt-sleeve weather," said co-discoverer Steven Vogt of the University of California at Santa Cruz.
2 remove
and i'll try to blog about other stuff besides "baby" as i'm sure you are bound to get sick of hearing it but it's hard as that is my life now
Well Baby, I failed. My hopes are up. My heart is laid out for everyone to see. I guess I just don't know how to do it any other way.
Some video from Daily News Egypt:
Over the last few posts, I’ve shared my thoughts on building the character of Michael Evans; the how and what of all that is involved in the process. Not often do you get the privilege of baring a show’s mechanics, and I’m honored that you’ve stuck with me on this exploration “behind the curtain.”
Then, there is another blind person seen in Acts 13. This man is Bar Jesus, who has a perfect name; Son of God our Saviour. This becomes the more apparent from Exodus 4:22. “And thou shalt say unto Pharaoh, Thus saith the Lord, Israel is my son, even my firstborn.” So Bar Jesus becomes a picture of the nation, Israel. Now we turn to Acts 13:6 to identify this man. Bar Jesus was a sorcerer, a false prophet and a Jew.
MON – salmon, fish sticks for the kids, rice pilaf peas (we were supposed to have this last week but we had pizza Friday night because I was right by Trader Joes and picked up some of their fabulous pizza dough and made homemade pizza)
This morning was fun in my psychology class. It always reminds me of why I like working with college students. And I truly thank God that He is helping me to make connections to them because I do believe I already am.
"I know nothing of that place," said the tree. "But I know the woods where the sun shines and the little birds sing." Then it told them about its youth. The little mice had never heard the like of it. They listened very intently, and said, "My! How much you have seen! And how happy it must have made you."
But if your goal is to see those amazing abs, you’ll have to diet to lose body fat and focus on exercise that help you burn lots of calories and keep your metabolism high. Running, swimming, cycling, CrossFit are all great for burning calories then strength train with squats, lunges, push-ups, pull-ups, and other exercises that engage your major muscle groups. Also make sure that you exercise with some intensity to also rev up your metabolic rate.
It’s no surprise that predicative sweet-ass as shit is no good, given that predicative sweet-ass is no good, either. Attributive *sweet-ass as shit may be ungrammatical simply because it’s a long adjective phrase coming before the noun it modifies–the same thing that happened with ?sweet as shit car, but made worse now with the addition of ass-intensification.
It was Facenda’s voice, and his pace of delivery (never hurried) without overmodulation, that could turn a pedestrian script into something which the listener surely thought was penned by William Butler Yeats or Ezra Pound. Facenda’s last narration for NFL Films was his rendition for Super Bowl XVIII (he died in 1984). He never uttered “the frozen tundra of Lambeau Field” that was attrubuted to him by Chris Berman’s poor attempt at mimicry of true class.
Once upon a time, my kids (and my class) had a wonderful, well-loved book by Richard Scarry called “What Do People do All Day?”, where the newspaper-editor pig sat at his typewriter, wearing his eyeshade. Was there also a large lady hippo, lying on a sofa, with a scroll and a bunch of grapes by her side, or is that just the illusion so many people have of the writer's life?
I have been around the block a time or two.
Penguin have combined my two favourite things in their latest themed series - books and food. The all new 'Great Food' series, due to release this April will feature around 20 books, which cover 'the funniest, most delicious food literature from the past 400 years'.
All because people were responding to their civic duties, showing up by 8 a.m. for jury duty that wasn’t supposed to happen.
And evening naps.
Cline, so involved with the story in the song’s lyrics, reportedly cried through most of what would be her last sessions. This emotion can be heard on certain tracks, especially “Sweet Dreams” and “Faded Love”. At the playback party that night at the studio, according to singer Jan Howard on the documentary Remembering Patsy, Cline held up a copy of her first record and a copy of her newest tracks and stated, “Well, here it is…the first and the last.”
At lunchtime, I had a sandwich made from my husband's home-made bread. He makes bread a lot, but, as the saying goes, Results May Vary. Sometimes the bread is so dense that if I have a sandwich of it for lunch, I can't get up to teach Periods 4 and 5 and they have to organise me a cover teacher. Sometimes, it's just the opposite, and has so many holes in it that it virtually counts as a diet food and means that after I've had a sandwich, I can eat three muffins and still not feel guilty. Today it was in between and the only downside was that I wasn't eating it at home while listening to You and Yours and getting ready for a nice snooze.
And the guy was so tiny.
Some months back. Lew Bryson of Malt Advocate asked me about increasingly common options for so-called "white" whiskeys from American distilleries. Lew was probably just looking for a quip. What he got was me in a chatty mood and (edited for length and clarity) this:
Candied fennel fronds evoke images of a wintry Christmas, and even the licorice and cocoa combination somehow remind me of gingerbread.
18. Metamorphosis (Organ Freak out 2) (00:33)
This is simply in responce to some things i've spotted over the past few days looking up and down the beer isles of Tesco and Morrisons lately. The first of which was the refurb of Carlings beer scene. Not only have they changed the look of their canned beers, they have also brought along a stronger 4.8% version in bottle form (sound familiar anyone) and to seemingly attract a younger market i.e. around my own age as we all love shiny alcoholic drinks that taste of nothing and get us drunk quicker.
You say you’re young, too young
This has been a fun year on Facebook. Old high school pals and acquaintances have been turning 40. I've been trying to say witty and fun things for everyone's 40th birthday. I think we all should embrace the 40 and run with it. So many sayings about 40 is the new 20 and all that.
Hey teachers! It's Monday morning...already! Starbucks would like to help make your Mondays in September just a little bit less stressful. The following was on their blog
8. Just replaced my copy of "The Unheard Music," the great documentary about X. It's one of those things you lend out and never get back because it gets lent out again.
In 2011, 179 journalists were imprisoned worldwide, up from 145 the previous year while another 67 were killed last year; 17 more so far this year. They were murdered, killed on dangerous assignments or died in crossfire, Payne said.
So, once again, here is another collection of photographs for your viewing pleasure. Even those of you who are not fans of the mini, may appreciate the memories.... whether they be good or bad.
Then there is the cat. Who is very sweet, but also completely insane. For months now, he has been convinced that his tail is stalking him. So, he tries to bite it to teach it a lesson, with predictable results. It gets worse when he is stressed. Last week, he had three teeth removed because he is kind of old, and he promptly went all psycho on his tail and chewed it up so bad that the vet had to take two inches right off.
GLAAD. “Where We Are On TV Report: 2010-2011 Season.” Sept. 2011. Accessed online 07 December 2011. http://www.glaad.org/publications/tvreport10
eyes - grey marvy pen
I'm sure most of you have seen my cover for NEVER ENOUGH by now. If not, here it is:
I look upon them and I wonder, do they deserve what is coming to them, these stupid. immature and cowardly people who flocked to sign their death warrants in polling booths across the land, do they want to be saved and are they in fact beyond saving?
What was your favorite subject as a child?
On a second thought, why does He even have to try?
Eve's Christmas ... LMN ... 8 PM
SNAIL Adhesive (104332)
Osborn #1 – 5
A minimalist dance performance by Anne Teresa Keersmaeker called Fase: Four Movements to the Music of Steve Reich, never really been one for dance but in these spaces it could be pretty epic.
But the small country’s Herculean effort to join the exclusive trade club is a reminder to the ten other least developed countries (LDCs) now seeking membership of the cumbersome process involved.
Have a very happy weekend, wherever you are in the world.
Tom Sawyer – Rush
My computer is a salvage yard of sorts. Look hard enough and you’ll find essays finished and abandoned and others that are a few sentences short, a few sentences long, or badly broken. Poems pause mid-line at some insurmountable “like…” Sketches for stories spotlight part of a character or plot with no clue what’s ahead or why. All of it is junk, experience added to a vast slag heap.
So for people that are interested in seeing who actually won any of the giveaways you just need to go to the giveaway post and it will tell you once the giveaway has ended and the winners have been drawn and announced.
I explained to her my deep Spiritual connection to the Dark in all it's beautiful forms. The Dark Goddess, particularly the Mother archetype (which I believe I am), The physical Darkness of the morning and evening hours that call to my soul to sit and listen since I can not see. The Darkness of Depression. A time where my mind shuts off completely (a beautiful refuge after a particular Manic phase) and I become numb. A period of deep hibernation that Mother Goddess feels it is time I mentally, emotionally, Spiritually and physically need.
I've spent my youthful hours
“We cannot imagine what they went through, their generosity of thought at such a horrendous time is completely selfless and amazing.”
Aside from the interested parties
On the Susan Komen, Planned Parenthood scandal:
My hope is we can get questions answered without my having to engage in a one on one email conversation.
Mixing up and making sure you look at age, sex and location can also help you see how you are perceived by women to men, teens to adults and west coast to east coast.
With work and school and sickness, I pushed that to the very bottom of my to-do list. It all sounded groovy in the session, but real-world settled back into view and it just wasn't going to work into my schedule. Well, I didn't want it to work into my schedule to be honest. And then tonight I watched that episode, and saw that part and it all came back and I knew I had to do it. So I did. I stood in front of her room, phone in hand with the timer set for 30 minutes. And can you believe that I was nervous?? My heart was beating fast and I was getting anxious. It was an unreal feeling. I opened the door, turned on the light and sat. Set the timer and off I went....
-HIDE THE EVIDENCE, MORON
* give me the silent treatment for days
Therefore, brothers, pick out from among you seven men of good repute, full of the Spirit and of wisdom, whom we will appoint to this duty. (Acts 6:3 ESV)
I say "middle of nowhere" but it was actually right down the street. It just felt like the middle of nowhere. It was awesome. It's a nature preserve and it's gorgeous. Who knew there was still some land that hasn't been over-run by buildings and parking lots here in Jacksonville?
when I got there she let me know everything was perfect. and as it should be.
And that cannot stop their tears.
Jennifer's computer melted down last week, and we are both having a crazy time of it...she with work and illness, and I with moving. Finally. But both of us are feeling overwhelmed and a little guilty about not commenting on entries. So this will be the last OLW for at least a few weeks while we both try to catch up and catch our breath and regroup. Please know that we really, truly appreciate each and every entry!
I get that some people just aren’t into holidays. I get that some of you guys are just bitter. I get that some of you are still trying to figure out what a “contrarian” is. I get it.
Slightly hazy-copper color with a light beige meringue head that has good staying power. Syrupy grapefruit and fresh, floral pine oil control the nose along with some slight toasted malt. The body is medium with a fine carbonation, giving a zesty mouthfeel that becomes creamy as it warms. Fresh cut grass and the oily Columbus hop character quickly take over the palate to provide a clean bite of citric, grapefruit character and with juicy fruit gum, which yields a crisp fresh taste. Malty undertones of crust and caramel help to balance Pine Belt’s flavor while the hop bitterness progressively increases and loiters on the tongue after each sip. I found this local gem at Spec’s in Houston and I look forward to when this beer is available in Beaumont.
Once again: This is by no means a super complex plan. It’s also not by the books .mil. The intent is to present a plan for the reader to examine. Remember – this isn’t geared to .mil types, but rural farmers and ranchers. For those so inclined to read further in depth HERE is an excellent Introduction to Terrain Analysis.
Every celebrity was memorable though. Al Simmons was first on stage and not only did he make an entrance but he also threw himself at the judges afterwards, to the shock of his scene partner Nan Fewchuk. Tracy Koga was charming and a joy to watch as she sped through a relationship with actor Tyhr Trubiak. Laurie Mustard was so natural on stage, everyone had to wonder if he’d missed his calling, plus he played beautifully off scene partner Lois Brothers. Howard Mandshein had a chance to rock out and was the perfect straight man to partner Danielle Savage’s neurotic character in How It Works. In yellow rain coat, boots and covered in mud Judy Wasylycia-Leis made quite the entrance for her scene with Kevin Anderson. Of course the judges were able to play off of the notion of a former politician playing a character involved in a cover-up! Randall King brought his brother’s words to life in David King’s Life Skills and managed to remain focused even when opposite him Cheryl Gensiorek was eating fettuccini with her bare hands.
We all said your goodbyes most of the family left the hospital. My step mother did not want to stay but my step sister and niece stayed and kept vigil with me,
All of the teams that make it to the Finale will compete for prizes including luxury golf and wine tours to South Africa and Europe from Mantis, as well as Callaway prizes including personal fittings and complete sets of golf clubs. In addition, all entrants will be eligible to win a six-day Ultimate Irish Links Golf Tour sponsored by IRISH LINKS. The schedule of events, registration details, and information about the Els for Autism Center of Excellence can be found at www.E4Agolf.com. Each team will register on the site, have their own team page, and will choose their own child on the spectrum that they play for (their “Honorary Captain.”) Teams will be able to e-mail their page to friends, family and colleagues, who will be able to text, make online, or mail in donations. Each team will have a goal of raising a minimum of
I forgot my camera when we took this trek to the "Up House". So this is taken with my iPhone just as it was getting dark. Pictures not so great, but the memories made with my girls, priceless! This picture show my daughter Cheyanne in the red jacket and her sweet friend Jori in the blue jacket.
Finished blankets can be dropped off at any of their centres or can be posted to:
Canned Food
A shadow is looming over my every move, stalking me as I dodge and weave amongst flashing blades coated in red.
The official policy of multiculturalism makes the task of Islamic terrorists much easier. Like the black criminal, the terrorists know that the “racist” card can be very effective in deterring the attentions of the police. What in the BBC’s speech code are referred to as “leaders of the Muslim community” are very quick to claim that Muslims are being persecuted and that we the white indigenous population must be sympathetic to Islam - that we must respect it – though they never really explain why people in this country should feel well disposed towards immigrants who hate us so much that they are prepared to become homicide-suicide bombers. This failure to deal with incipient Islamic terrorism and its networks means that some two decades of neglect have made the task of penetrating and destroying these networks immensely difficult. Obvious and easily accessible targets and options for Islamic terrorist organisations seeking to inflict as much chaos and destruction on Britain as possible are: cultural targets; infrastructure targets; and urban insurgency.
With these reviews I simply want to point out those which you might want to consider, others which are helpful but not without fault, those which have no relevance at all, and others which contain grievous errors which should be avoided.
I still need to cut enough hexagons for about 15 more blocks, but I've had enough cut to keep me busy, so I haven't done that yet.
Here are several other challenges I am entering this card into:
No one dies so long as the death-lord is present. That is why the great sages invited him here. Ho! Let us humans now drink the immortal nectar of words about the activities of Hari!
held his heart in his hands,
Mix together sourdough starter, vinegar, salt and 3 cups of flour. Add water and mix until dough comes off the sides of the bowl. Cover and let rest for 10 minutes. Knead for 10-15 minutes, adding flour when necessary.
As it is, the temptations are strong to start another army. Dark Eldar are cool, and I really like the new Necron annihilation barge. I’ve also developed a sudden hankering for Marauder Horsemen, Howling Banshees and Eternal Guard. Oh, yes, an army of Caledor, of course.
Are they filming a TV show or documentary?
Just as a point of reference, in 2010 Governor Palin's batting average for getting her picks into Congress was .784.
I felt immediately at home here, despite my lack of ability to communicate with the bartender other than through primitive sign language (point to bottle; insert tip of thumb into mouth; tilt head back sharply). They had a fine selection of rums not commonly found in American bars, including a half-dozen Jamaican sugar cane rums I wasn’t familiar with.
One of my fave meals to cook and freeze is lentil bolognaise – it freezes well, its cheap to cook, it defrosts quickly and it is healthy! OMG I know bet you never thought you would see that on here!
Regarding global competition, you're only as good as your last product or design. But reaching BMW's level of expertise and quality takes many years. Heritage of quality is a key ingredient.
Achilles continues to fight forward. Daily, they move from one small village to the
A couple of weeks later, I received a letter, telling me I had to go to the prefecture (police station) to start the work permit process. I went to my neighborhood police station and the line was all the way out the building and around the corner. I turned around and went back home. A few days later, after fortifying myself with...coffee, I went again. No line! I breezed right through the front door, up the steps to the immigration room, and as I fumbled with the ticket machine, I looked at the 85 people waiting in chairs in front of one tiny reception desk. Good thing I had nothing to read.
So, I know that I have to give up things I like to do, things I enjoy, but the hardest thing to do is give up your family. Everyday it is a fight to even out my time with my family and my studies. I know that in a year and a half I will be out of school. I will be able to give them the time they deserve when I am home. Truly can't wait for that day!!
She passed down to me,
We the walked back to the car and continued our drive to Killarney. It only took us about an hour to get to Killarney from Blarney and it was an uneventful drive. We did note that the Irish Open was going to be held in Killarney at the end of July and were happy we weren’t there for that weekend.
This is the first one I've done and I was surprised how well it came out as I normally mess these things up first time round! lol!
Presentation: 10/10- Even if the game’s visuals show a few cracks, being based on a monochromatic foundation from 1993, you really can’t argue that the usual triple-A Nintendo presentation is present and accounted for here! The game’s flashy intro is very impressive even for Game Boy Color standards, and the title screen, despite the silly Wind Fish egg, sounds with the familiar Zelda theme and looks quite stylish! The menus and such look rather dated and confined when viewed on a cutting-edge 3DS screen as opposed to a more simplistic Game Boy Color scheme that wasn’t even backlit back in the early 90′s, and the 3DS’s sharp backlighting draws attention to more visual blemishes than you would not have otherwise noticed, not to mention it means lighting dark rooms in dungeons is now pretty pointless when it’s not necessary to solve a puzzle. The 3DS’s backlight makes floor patterns and obstacles in darkened rooms easily visible now, even without lighting the torches. Still, LADX marked an eye-catching showcase of what the Game Boy Color was really capable of back in 1998, and just how impressive the Game Boy foundation from 1993 really was!
I would appreciate your help! If you notice any pictures that are not working, please let me know so I can fix them.
Remember pushing good people away and messing up your relationships, just because you couldn’t trust or believe anymore?
JYJ‘s Yoochun will not be serving the regular Korean military duty because of the chronic asthma he was born with. Instead, he will be assigned to a public service personnel position to replace his two year mandatory military service. The exact date of his enlistment (with public service) has not been determined yet.
Please bear with me for the pictures. I'm still trying to figure out how to get the best pictures. I almost always need a flash, but then the pictures are very bright. If I don't use the flash, then most of the time it's blurry. Those times that it isn't, well the pictures are yellow. There just is no in between! I have HORRIBLE lighting in my apartment, and I take my pictures in the evenings most of the time anyway. If you have any tips and suggestions, please past them on! This gal needs it! Moving on...
Well ... well ... well ... summer seems to have arrived early and with a big bang! It was 105 here over the weekend and we're not even into the last week of April. Where, or where is that house with a pool that I'm looking for? Still being elusive even though I've been diligently hunting. Just love going into vacant, hot houses in this weather to see if they might fit the bill. I was kind last year when we had a house for sale here; we left the air conditioner running so visitors would feel comfortable staying around and looking rather than heading quickly back to their air conditioned cars. Seems others have not caught on yet.
Dries said that the numerous bullet holes in the walls of the passage testified to the fact that his father had been shot at more than six times.
Oh the bang. I’ve had a love hate relationship with the bang. I love them, I hate them, I can’t live without them, but I’m on the 12 step, 12 month program where I am letting them grow out. It’s never easy to grow out your bangs, and by the time you do grow them out, they are back in style again and you concede to have them trimmed again. But getting bangs is like having that last drink of the night when you know it’s time to go home. You wind up blacking out and having to hear from a friend that your rendition of Journey’s “Don’t Stop Believing”, was the best they’d seen in years, and has instantly become a YouTube sensation. Now Daniel Tosh is calling you to be on his web show and you realize you really can’t make it out there to do the show because you are in the middle of growing out your bangs. Damn the timing. There’s only one thing you regret more than that drink, and it was cutting your bangs to begin with. Can someone please explain to me why it takes your hair less than 6 months to grow 6-8 inches, but your bangs take a full year to completely recover. Isn’t it all hair to begin with?
Enveloped in the warmth, Leigh’s whole body breathed in the scent that permeated the air.
Here's the archives quilt with the binding on. Love the back with the Etchings map, handwriting, and architectural drawings!!
You know what I realized? I was hesitating about posting the things that I believe God told me about my marriage because I didn’t know if I really believed it anymore. It has been easy to say I did. But, God was opening my eyes to the fact that deep down, in the dark places of my soul. I had quit believing. Quit hoping.
2) I miss Pinterest.
*handfuls of almonds and water throughout the day
This was not really my week... Next week can only be better with lots of things to share with you.
The prologue is a bit too high in the Weird Level for the WoD, I did a similar trick one week in TWH.
I have pondered on the mention of Johannesburg, South Africa on Holden's later card mounts at some length, without coming to any firm conclusion. It is possible he visited South Africa at some stage, perhaps even intending to cater to the large number of troops heading out there during the Boer War. His brother John claimed, in his fanciful book A Wizard's Wanderings from China to Peru, to have travelled widely, and I think it likely that Johannesburg may also have been the the result of George's lively imagination.
Yellowstone
Well my friends, Day 2 has not ended yet, that's for sure. Can you recognise the guy up in the photo above?I have not told you about Chef Tyler Florence's surprised show up at the Tasting Pavilion. Yup, that is right.. Chef Tyler Florence people!! He's one of the chef that I idolised amongst others and shall not name them right now, as I prefer to have this post spotlight on Chef Tyler Florence.
You think? And how did we get there?
For seven decades now, the Beeb has been asking a series of famous and not-so-famous guests to imagine being sent alone to a desert island, and to consider what music and books they might bring with them into solitude. In between listening to excerpts from their favourite pieces of music, guests are asked generally good-natured questions about their life and work.
Multinationals are far stronger in these areas but face other challenges, such as high attrition among talented Chinese nationals that can slow efforts to create local innovation centers. Indeed, the contrasting capabilities of domestic and multinational players, along with the still-unsettled state of intellectual-property protection (see sidebar, “Improving the patent process”), create the potential for topsy-turvy competition, creative partnerships, and rapid change. This article seeks to lay out the current landscape for would-be innovators and to describe some of the priorities for domestic and multinational companies that hope to thrive it.
Three great children's writers died this year: Diana Wynne Jones, Eve Ibbotson and - just recently - Russell Hoban. I am a cover-to-cover reader of DWJ, though my favourites are Fire and Hemlock, Howl's Moving Castle and A Tale of Time City. She will be much missed. I haven't read as much Eve Ibbotson as I should but after A Dog and his Boy and The Secret Countess, I know I'll follow up on the others.
Anyway when the Queen was announced our girl was so shocked and amazed. She cried and cried then danced like a crazy person with her date who won king. It's nice when kids do the right thing. Rare and amazing, and very nice.
Alas, I am unable to find out, because when I tried to use the service, it insisted I sign in and then choose my company. Two "The Zack Company, Inc." files appeared to exist in their "App Center." One had a number next to it (presumably the one that was already syncing) and one did not. I tried to choose the one with the number. It insisted I had to be logged in as an Administrator to use it. Of course I was logged in as an Admin, so what was the issue? I have no idea. On a whim, I tried the other version next. This kicked me to a help screen that instructed me to "enable" the Sync Manager. Only problem? It was already running.
One of the things on my list was to make my own Christmas stockings this year (before the next Christmas rush). Well, check me out. . . .
REALITY: From May-August, this team dominated baseball like no other. With John Lackey having a historically atrocious season. And J.D. Drew’s bat finally disappearing. Both are gone this year, while the rest of the league’s best offense returns with bit players like Cody Ross and Ryan Sweeney filling in some of the blanks. And that’s not even considering the likelihood that Carl Crawford returns to at least his average career numbers. Sure, Josh Beckett’s peripherals will likely regress a bit, and Jon Lester might never quite make it over the hump into dominant ace territory. But they don’t need to for Boston to take the division, especially with Clay Buchholz returning and a strong spring from Felix Doubront. Andrew Bailey’s potential thumb surgery at press time complicates matters, but I wouldn’t be surprised if Daniel Bard returns to the bullpen to anchor a deep core of relievers. And yeah, Bobby Valentine is destined to flame out at some point, but he traditionally gives his teams a bump in his first year. Don’t be fooled by the once
Cline used the term of endearment “Hoss” to refer to her friends, and referred to herself as The Cline. According to the book “Honky Tonk Angel: The Intimate Story of Patsy Cline” by Ellis Nassour, Patsy Cline met Elvis Presley in 1962 at a fundraiser at St. Judes and they even exchanged phone numbers. Having seen him perform during one of his rare Grand Ole Opry appearances, she admired his music, called him The Big Hoss, and recorded with his backup group, The Jordanaires.
I actually found my dress at Nordstrom Rack for a STEAL! Regular $395 ~ I purchased it for just about $25. Hubby's fabulous outfit ~ Smiley's curtains, tied together with rope, a dashing red sash created with a bedsheet and he pulled out his old (we're talking college days) Birkenstock sandals.
I will get you a picture to show off, it’s a waterfall, then goes into a river under our front deck and to a pond on the other side, very soothing to listen too..
It also reinforces the idea that the safety foreign visitors enjoyed during the tournament in June was a mirage. This murder then shows how life has returned to normal after the soccer fans departed.
Map Mafia Island, Tanzania.Related
are the ones who need god to be stood where he stands
Spearville is also home to a wind farm, built in 2006. Joe was so absorbed in the construction and start-up of this project that anytime we were in town (almost every day of the week, that is), he insisted on driving a wide circuit to the various sites where the turbines were being anticipated, stored, assembled, and tested. He still can't take his eyes off the windmills for long -- our game on the way to town is always "Guess how many windmills are turning!" (Usually at least 2 or 3 are being serviced.)
Deeming the Fukushima meltdowns no deterrent to their previous plans, the Indian government and its agencies have tried to downplay fears about nuclear power in general, and those concerning the Koodankulam nuclear plant in particular. The plant, located right on the ocean at the country’s southern tip, bears a certain situational resemblance to Fukushima.
My 37th week of pregnancy started out beautifully. On Tuesday, May 1st my husband and I had a couple of doctors appointments spread out, so we decided to make it a date day. He called and set up a pregnancy massage for me as a surprise. We started out the day at the OB's office. She was worried he flipped back breech because of how I was carrying, so she had me step into the ultrasound room quickly. Luckily he was still head down. My appointment was fairly uneventful. My group B strep test came back negative, height of fundus measured 39 weeks (she said he's all stretched out), a finger tip dilated and soft. Everything looked good and we were on our way. We went to lunch at our favorite restaurant, First Watch, then did some shopping. I got two more potential coming home outfits, one at Janie and Jack and another at a cute little boutique we stumbled upon. After some shopping we went to my NST. Everyone at both appointments kept talking about my version and all the "excitement," guess we were the talk around the office. Now that he's not breech, it's harder to keep him on the monitor, he kept moving away, she had to buzz him to get him moving, then he wouldn't slow down. It was one of my more stressful NST's and even though they let me go and said he looked fine, I was still a bit nervous after what happened last week. My ultrasound there looked fine, amniotic fluid at a good level, but my husband and I got really nervous when the tech who called us back was the hard pusher. She said she recognized us and I wondered if she had been told about my complaint. This time she pressed a normal amount and it didn't hurt at all. Next was dinner out, grilled shrimp at Chili's, then on to Becoming Mom Spa for my pregnancy massage and paraffin foot treatment. It was so relaxing. A huge storm blew in on our way there and we were both drenched by the time we made our way from our front row parking space. Neat thing about that storm, on the way home, we saw a double rainbow. That is the second double rainbow I've seen recently. I knew that had to be a good sign for our rainbow baby.
Mom's doctor recommended that the best treatment for Mom's Complex Regional Pain Syndrome (a severe pain disease) is a Spinal Cord Stimulator, which has electrodes on her spinal cord that block the pain signals. It isn't a cure and won't stop her pain but it will help a lot. The insurance company required a psychological evaluation for approval. That was the doctor who didn't approve of Mom having a service dog.
Until last year, I had NEVER even picked up a paint brush, so I am rather happy with how quickly I have developed my skills. I love being able to use my eye in a new way.
And cue Fred MacMurray as a superhero –
I didn't want this to read like an obituary, but more like a 'this is what Sunrise closing means to me'. When I saw Sara sitting on the back step of Sunrise the day they closed, I asked how she felt. Her response was simply, 'it feels weird.' Owning a business is, as I've said a million times, a lifestyle. The good news is it's a lifestyle you get to choose. I enjoy it because I still feel the passion for creating, for making people happy, for employing local youth, and for being able to spend my time in a happy and social place. It comes with the price of long hours, hard work, risk, and physical labor. I admire Carl for creating something from nothing, for taking a chance on this little town that couldn't, for putting his skills for creating amazing culinary treats to good use, and for getting up at 3:30 am nearly every day of the week for over a decade to do it. I'd guess he and Sara are feeling an emotional hangover of relief, sadness, guilt, angst over the future, and just plain 'weird'. Endings are never easy, but they do give us a chance to stop for a minute and reflect on how far we've come and what we've learned, before we decide where we're going next.
-A grown-up with the era of 16 a long time or more.
This is the advice I so thoughtfully gave, and that WordPress won’t let me delete. Assholes.
Soanyways, I have read everything that you all want me to write about and I have blog posts ready to go! I'd say expect them in the next week or so, but life just got so ridiculously busy. I need to sleep this weekend and get ahead on my homework, and that will be that.
I work in advertising. I know while the company line about the size of the carts might be convenience, they're actually giving you all that room so you'll buy more. Here's what I have to say about that: thank you, thank you, thank you.
The number of visitors for June increased by 7 percent from 3.1 million in 2010 to 3.3 in 2011, according to a monthly report from the Las Vegas Convention and Visitors Authority. Room rates for the month increased 13 percent from $90 last year to $101 in June of this year.”
WHATEVER LOVE MEANS,
The United States is the largest consumer of energy in the world in terms of total use. According to the Energy Information Administration’s statistics the average rate of energy use has been 335.9 million BTUs per person from 1980 to 2006. The use of petroleum has been increasing in the united states by 0.5 percent annually. This continued rate of use of petroleum is putting harmful emissions into the atmosphere at a greater and greater rate.
Jesus and Buddha: The Parallel Sayings ~ edited by Marcus Borg, 1997
No batteries are needed (a huge plus for me). The speakers charge through my laptop, and --coolest of all-- they charge and connect through built-in, retractable charge/audio cables. Man, that's cool! Eliminates most of the packing needed to get stereo sound. There's one cable included to connect the speakers to each other, that's it, and I wouldn't even need to use it if I wasn't charging. They're that clever.
Mojo Monday #172
My spiritual development teacher, Dawn Chrystal, patiently listened to my panicky sobs on the other end of the phone, helping me through the hysteria. She’s a wonderfully calm person and I regained composure fairly quickly. I think I panicked because I was so scared to reach out to someone I don’t see very often at all, especially about feelings that are so despairing and private and excruciatingly painful. Also talking about the emotions to her made them seem all the more real and raw.
Add the cooked meats to a large dutch oven or stockpot. Stir in the next
Here is a totally funny story. I'm going to tell on myself.
"It's Brooklyn, it's the architecture, it's Jay-Z, a new father, I might add, it's Nets basektball, it's everything," Ratner responded, "everything that you could imagine that you woudl want in the arena. The brand is really all the great events, plus the Nets, plus the architecture, plus the Jay-Z celebrity types, and so on.
Carlow Brewing Company O'Hara's Irish Stout
He's crayzee. He's high octane all day long. Playful, funny, smart. He fetches like a dog and LOVES being with us. All he wants to do his schnuggle. He loves his big sister, his mom and dad and LOVES to torment his big brother cat. Pouncing on him, biting him, teasing him....genreally being a younger brother annoyance. Yet, when they are peaceful. It is heaven
And, continuing the TOTP tradition of saving the best song till the play-out, we finish with Peter Gabriel and Solsbury Hill.
But it occured to me the other day that I never ever get around to making anything that I see on the programmes.
Well, it was a jolly group that made our way to Elterwater, where there is a lovely and easy walk from the car park towards the Lake. It was rather drizzly that day, and my sis and I were conscious that we should tread carefully as we did not want Mum or our B&B guests to trip and fall while walking. Suffice to say that they all did well, but when it started to become rather puddly, we thought that we should turn back. Visit Cumbria tells us that ‘Elterwater is a small lake that lies half a mile (800 m) south-east of the village of the same name. Both are situated in valley of Great Langdale.’ (www.visitcumbria.com/amb/elterwater.htm)
And being so plagued by these questions, and in need of answers, I ran the post by my dear mother.
The Red Cow is a pub I remember well from the late 80's as a diminutive, blue-smokey, local drinkers pub. A bit of a male preserve it has to be said. A place for a sociable pint or three, horse racing on the telly, and for many men (myself included!) a welcome haven from the drudgery of shopping in the very heart of the market town of Harborough.
Gaining too much weight:- It’s very likely that I’d still eat the same calories if I allowed myself things, so this makes no sense.
Hope you like it, it took me a little while to decorate it.
Julie Kagawa felt that Sighvatsson was the right producer to partner with because of his tremendous track record for getting his films made and his passion for her books. "Joni does not take on a project unless he really loves it," Kagawa said. "He's thoughtful and established, and I know he's going to make a great movie that respects my material."
Yesterday was a dreich, damp day here. Morning fog barely dissolved into low-hanging mist and fine drizzle, shrouding the hills and beading every branch with drops of water. For once, however, this ‘fine soft weather’ (as drenching rain is called in the West Highlands) seemed not melancholy to me, but promising. It really did feel ‘soft’: there was no icy edge to it for the first time in several months. It smelled of spring.
and many more; the owners, squeezed
My kids love broccoli and it is a very easy dish to prepare. Simple stir frying gives the dish a nice aroma and it can be considered a healthy meal too.
Headlights - Morning Parade
- Mixed soft leaves
While I ponder the importance of friendship, let's talk about people who definitely do not read the blog. Let's start with Supermodel Neighbor. Supermodel Neighbor is not yet my neighbor and probably never will be since The Goddamn House purchase is uncertain, plus Supermodel Neighbor may move to Portland. I finally met Supermodel Neighbor last week while out walking the neighborhood with Seattle Mom. He came out to say hi. Super friendly guy.
Regular readers will already know that if there's one thing I just can't resist, it's a good read-a-thon. Well, and kittens. And book shopping. And Easter eggs. But read-a-thons are right up there, okay! And this one's a whole week long and has its own blog, Twitter account and hashtag and everything...
It was during a time in my life where I had to make some decisions about my future. For the longest time I wanted to transition from writing part-time, to full-time. But I couldn’t imagine quitting my day job and losing the security of a steady paycheck, benefits, etc. But at the same time, full-time work made it challenging to write. I don’t say impossible, because I had written two novels while I held a day job. So when my company decided to outsource my entire department, I found myself without a job. During the time in which I search for a new one, I gave myself to writing full-time. It was during this time, when I wrote like crazy and took advantage of the situation, that I wrote DARKROOM. In some ways, it was a test to see if I had what it took to be a long-term professional writer.
Today, my mom spent almost all day talking with our providers to get the service again...
look for an alternative electronic route or
68. Repetitive injury. Sports such as football, soccer, and boxing all run a higher risk of repetitive injury, so play safe.
1tbsp agave nectar
The Mocknick Productions Literary Agency is a fee-charging entity. The fees have gone from 450.00 to represent a writer to a whole 500.00 according to my source.
and weighs a lifetime.
You may have seen my GoGreen Champ Pocket Diaper review a few weeks ago. Now I've had the opportunity to review a standard Go Green Pocket Diaper as well. If you missed out on the last champ giveaway, don't worry. Next week I'll be doing a side by side comparison of the champ and standard diaper, along with another champ giveaway!
Earlier this morning I received a phone call from DS Zia of Bexleyheath Metropolitan Police. He invited me to go and speak to him at the police station today. I enquired as to what it was about and he refused to tell me. I asked whether it was going to be like last time and I’d be arrested. He refused to tell me. I advised Mr Zia that I wasn’t prepared to go down to the police station unless I knew whether I was going to be arrested or not.
A PAPER CLIP is to remind you that you have all the tools to hold it together.
we are doing a cheese fondue and a chocolate fountain fondue
Part 3: Pill Induced Slumber
May 5,2012
See you tomorrow night. Quote:
I thought for a moment. “Dane, come here.”
I love Julie’s writing style.It’s so …slightly and she write like a teenager.Really.When I read “Ruby Blue”,I thought that Julie it’s a teenager…Love that!
And may have grown more arrogant being a ghost.
So try this for a few nights or meditation sessions and I have a feeling that it will be very helpful to you!
This card was my first play with some yummy new in-colours - pool party, island indigo, calypso coral & lucky limeade...& I reeeeally like them!
In extreme (and fortunately rare) cases, this can have heartbreaking consequences society expressed its disgust in the failure of child protective services workers to identify this perilous situation, but if someone from outside his family read Christian’s anguished “school essays,” might the outcome have been different?
Daniel Sturridge scored after 45 seconds before John Terry headed home and Torres struck twice as Chelsea swept into a 4-0 lead after 25 minutes. Torres sealed his hat-trick after the break, with Florent Malouda making it 6-0 before Djibril Cisse’s consolation. Chelsea are sixth, with QPR above the drop zone on goal difference. Playing with the sort of confidence and ability which persuaded Blues owner Roman Abramovich to pay £50m for his services, Torres ripped the Rangers defence to pieces with his direct running and clinical finishing. Clearly buoyed by his goal against Barcelona in the Champions League, he continually latched on to clever, probing through balls from Juan Mata, Salomon Kalou and Sturridge. And if the Champions League victory over Barcelona was built on solid foundations, this demolition was more to do with sheer skill and class.
I had been almost unable to function a few years ago and now I am so hurt to see my mother at the last years of her life to be so hurt, I am in such unbearable pain. I try not to let my children or her see me. I found myself crying at work the other day and I had to go into the bathroom to hide. It’s hard to swallow and I cannot explain this hurt to anyone. To look at my mother who has already lost two sons and may as well have lost the rest of her children. I cannot even explain all of the pain my mother has endured. It’s incredible for one woman.
“Pinterest. It’s a way to organize projects, recipes, design ideas…”
(For details on what else I'm wearing, see the first post). Don't worry, next week I'll have something different.
Iron Stylus: But it can also make money.
The witches then called the element of Air. The element responded by blowing fierce out of the west. For weeks the gales battered the battle damaged ships and pushed them ever closer to the rocky Irish coast.
We speed past the fraught making of Dancer In The Dark (her clash of wills with director Lars von Trier resulting in a vow to never act again) and Selmasongs, and move on to Vespertine, definitely not a warrior album (its working title was Domestika).
For each Jello layer: mix one cup boiling water to a package of Jello and stir until it's dissolved. Stir in 1/2 cup cold water.
We have three kids, and a few months back we moved William into a bed so that Marilee could move out of a pack ‘n’ play and into a crib. Over the course of the next few weeks William stayed up later and later and later. He got up earlier and earlier and earlier. One night, I held him on my lap. He was exhausted, but he refused to stay in his bed. I said, “William, what do you need to be able to go to sleep?” He turned his head to look at me and said, “Mom, I need a fence.” We put him back in his crib, and he returned to his previous pattern of sleeping 11 hours at night. In order to be still, he needed boundaries. He needed a fence.
I'm reading an amazing book called When Things Fall Apart by Pema Chödrön. She's an American Buddhist nun, and the book is a collection of teachings on all kinds of Buddhist approaches to life. Eric from the allotments lent me the book, he says he's had it in his shed for ages but I wasn't ready for it before.
I Want to make the world turn around
and “bitch” all the girls.
JA: We were attending a conference for children's book writers and illustrators. Every year, that conference has a theme party. That year, the theme was a Beach Bash. My two friends and I liked to dress up in similar costumes each year, so we went to a costume shop in the hopes of finding three similar beach-related costumes. The only thing they had three of were mermaid costumes, so that's what we dressed as. And, in the costume contest, we won first place!
I’m stuck, folks. What does one do with this? It doesn’t take up much room, but it seems silly to keep it in a drawer.
Most people struggle with “where to start”.
1-888-PREVENT
Best wishes to all my loyal readers and minions for a good Pilgrim’s Bounty this week. Be sure to gorge yourselves on utterly unhealthy volumes of food. If you run out, go raid the tables set up in Alliance towns and eat some of theirs, too. Then laugh at them. I’d recommend starting with Varian’s spread, just because.
The malfunctioning sprinklers gave an omen. After Torquay’s Eunan O’Kane was drenched during the warm-up, the day seemed destined to end with a dampener. But there was still some teasing to be done. When Delroy Facey headed a fine cross from Nicky Featherstone into the net from close range in the 11th minute, Hereford fans began to get excited, even though they knew that Barnet, whom they needed to draw or lose, had taken the lead at Burton.
Season with salt and pepper
Meyer was arrested for apparently being drunk in public and was put into the cells with eight other people. Van Wyk said it seemed Meyer had an argument and a fight broke out. Meyer died soon after from his injuries. Ntabazalila said no weapons were used in the fight. – Sapa
I got new gutters installed on the back of my house and then got a rainbarrel from the city, so of course, it has now ceased to rain.
456. Wings @ JR’s Place (Chicago, IL) 2:31 a.m.
On April 24, 1901, Patterson became the first pitcher to earn a victory in an official MLB American League game in a game against the Cleveland Blues. Roy peaked in 1903 and saw less playing time, until his last appearance in the majors on September 24, 1907. Although still with the White Sox, Patterson did not play in the 1906 World Series against the Chicago Cubs.
Shocked neighbor, Steve Francis, then tried to save the arm and hand by sticking them in a bag of frozen sausage rolls.
**I guess I didn't even read the photo caption - there are 1550 chairs in this installation! (where is that V8 when you need it?)
Now this fantastic app has branched out to food. They looked for writers that were local food bloggers in their target cities and that had something to add to make the experience as rich as possible.
That in my heart’s lake had endured throughout
Sometimes the familiarity of the well worn path makes it harder for us to see what’s changing around us. And even if we do see changes, we have to choose to adapt to them. One element that makes it difficult for us to easily embrace change is the time involved in learning new ways of doing things.
The Internal Revenue Service Form 990 for Cosmos shows that the Cosmos Foundation received $41,570,721 from taxpayers.
The white one is quite laid back.
No one gets, how much she wants to be free,
To view the video from KTLA:
Jamie is haunted by the terrifying fire that broke out in his family home. Sent to stay with his aunt in Somerset, his respite is interrupted by the strange incidents that occur in the small village. First the evil old witch in his nightmares, and the ancient chalk carving uncovered on Crownhill, then a tale emerges of a seventeenth century witchhunt victim. The thing that connects them all...fire. Jamie is forced to face his worst fear and uncover the truth.
–PvE is “hard”. Dying after just 2-3 hits. Learn to dodge. Even as ranged you dodge when arrows fly at you – they aren’t “heatseeking” like other MMO’s.
% cp science.txt tempfile.txt
When I rebooted last night I had an epiphany.
Thomas Dolby I scare myself UK
Covered under the bill is any person protected by the Secret Service. Although such protection isn’t extended to just everybody, making it a federal offense to even accidentally disrupt an event attended by a person with such status essentially crushes whatever currently remains of the right to assemble and peacefully protest.
Chief Executive Officer
Years ago, when the U.S.S.R. suddenly disappeared, there was great celebration and proclamations of how things would be better. I wondered how anyone could come up with this opinions, since it was only a few months before that there were thousands of warheads pointed at the United States by these fine people and the constant reminder we weren't friends.
1/4 cup alfredo sauce
Perhaps a weekly cage match. Entertain us without destroying our liberty. Make us smile, without stealing our stuff.
who shoulder burdens they cannot manage
then painstakingly instructed me as to how to arrange the rest.
How are you? Mom says it’s so cold there that you are wearing 5 layers in bed at night! Is that true? If I knitted you something warm (hat, scarf etc) could you wear it there? I guess you could wear it to bed, huh? I hear you have a pretty cool bachelor pad set up! Hubby is jealous…he wants a giant tv.
PS. A couple of weeks ago, someone was kind enough to send me a message through my 500px account, but I accidentally deleted it before responding whilst engaged in one of my e-mail clearing frenzies. I can't remember who it was from even (although they mentioned this blog and long distance relationships), so please feel free to re-send the message if you want to and I promise I will respond this time! I'm so sorry!
~ me ~
Procopius’ moralizing is pretty hilarious. Clearly, he hated Theodora for enjoying herself and getting Emperor Justinian to marry her even though she was a big Byzantine whore. He claimed that she was much given to black magic, and that it was through love philtres and the diabolic arts that she kept Justinian enslaved. Theodora’s boudoir was covered in dozens of bearskins, upon which she luxuriated sensuously as she entertained her customers. Her jokes were lewd, she wiggled her hips a lot, and the money poured in. “Never was anyone so completely given up to unlimited self-indulgence.”
Bright Blessings
maintaining self-confidence despite their medical condition.
Yet, there is liberation here. This is the liberation of speaking truth and finding freedom in that truth. After this GC, everyone knows that something must change. The main, foundational item that must be addressed: the issue of trust. If we, as a group of people committed to the work of God cannot learn to trust one another with our huge differences, then we have lost our way and our voice.
Late one night, NUTS follows his brother, Bold And Delinquent (BAD) cat, into the kitchen. The door to the garage is cracked open, and the outside garage door open as well.
But alas, we can. And we did. And I go into the car and find her smoking device and two zips of weed in the console and three roaches in the ashtray. I hold up the pipe. "This yours?"
Continuing with the idea of using scraps, I found this wonderful CardMap by Becky Fleck. I used 1/2" strips and wove them until I was happy with the look. I added some sentiments from the Authentique Noteables and Expressions cards and finished it all with some accents using my Pearl Pen. The quote, "A friend is someone who knows the song in your heart and can sing it back to you when you have forgotten the words," really struck a chord for me and I know exactly who I will be sending this to!
But it's not for me to ask.
by Immigration Minister Mr. Woolas;
Bush's interest in exploring the possibilities of the
Max's accomplishments over the course of a year:
the prints are clear and crisp, and appear just as they do online. the paper they are printed on was also high quality. sometimes i hesitate to order prints online, because they are sometimes printed on flimsy or inferior paper. NOT the case with this company!
2 cardamom pods, cracked - seeds only into pan (optional, but it is good!)
I’m going to chalk up most of the post race chatter to either youth – haven’t been watching the sport very long). Nationalism – we all like to think “our” athletes are unbeatable). Fanaticism - fans sometimes get so wrapped up in their athletes they refuse to believe anything negative can happen. Media Hype – the media loves to build up individuals and teams to seem unbeatable. Because the reality of Stockholm, and all the races that have and will take place this year, is that they are not some Electronic Arts video game with artificial characters taking part, but real flesh and blood individuals competing against each other – and all real people are beatable.
Michael Kirby’s illustrious career as a jurist has been informed by his personal experience as a gay man, and we look forward to the publication of his memoirs.
"No Way But The Hard Way" - 3:34
If Topps would win this auction and cut up the cap would with this be the first dual player worn memorabilia card? I don't think there has ever been one created.
Best Editor Long Form: Patrick Nielsen Hayden
As the holiday season fast approaches, what better way to get into the spirit then with a red and white cake and that to me means RED VELVET! Well if you are gluten-intolerant you too can now indulge this Christmas. This cake is gluten and egg free but best of all, tastes incredible. I frosted it with my own creation - a simple white chocolate buttercream that paired so well with this smooth, luxurious cake.
Pyxis, Guardians and Shields...This story will blow your mind and make you read this book in one sitting!
"What are you looking at punk?"
Detecting the signs of Anorexia
This is a damp, lush country. The late winters are grey and depressing. The spring is often a disappointment. But then in May, the condition of our life in these islands becomes heavenly. "When I die," Monty Don wrote in The Ivington Diaries, published last year, "I shall go to May. It will be green, actually the colour green in all its thousand shining faces. Every moment will be like the arc of a diver breaking the waters of a green lake, a shifting, growing hymn of light, colour and leaf."
This Week Groove meets "old-school lindy exchange after-hours"l with Guest DJ Kristin Buxton (Los Angeles)
Over the past thirty years, we have lost around a third of the total pub stock in Britain, but beer sales have plummeted by over 60%. Given this, it is perhaps surprising not that so many pubs have closed, but so few – and this must suggest that there is more pain to come. And before someone pipes up that “plenty of new bars have opened up to replace the lost pubs”, bear in mind that the sales figures quoted cover the entire on-trade including pubs, bars, clubs and hotels.
I admit, I never liked them, because I think they are bad actress and always play the same way. It's awful, give them 50.000 different roles, they will always play the same way, with the same voice, the same face, nothing original.
There was another hafla in early April here in Bellingham put on by Gretchen and Ruthie at the Belltower Studios. Again, I met a few people from Facebook and I always enjoy that and talking to them a little. The smaller haflas are nice in that regard. It’s a perfect place for dancers of all levels to practice their dance moves and get to know each other better. Sometimes with the bigger events it’s hard to do that and that’s why I like this particular event these two ladies put together. Oh, and the costumes they bring to sell…good thing I can’t fit into them! There were two especially nice performances. One was by a local lady who hadn’t performed since the mid-90’s and the other young lady performed for the first time for us. It was nice to witness those two performances being they will always remember them. You always remember your first performance!
I didn't glue down the ends of the strips of paper, so there would be a little play there. I added pop dots under the photo and mushroom sticker. Then I added some dew drops to the banner stickers and in the bird nest and then used some stickles to help pop the beautiful flowers that were already on the paper. A little twine tied around a letter in the title and of course I inked my edges and you have a gorgeous layout of my little guy exploring the grass in the backyard all on his own for the first time.
Then the 191 divisions send their 2,500 or so delegates to the Umno annual general assembly. Again, those who get to attend the general assembly will be decided by the division leaders. Those not in their gang are, again, locked out. So a mere 191 Umno leaders decide the fate of the entire country.
Bing has already ruffled some feathers with his open support of Robert Bobb, the state-appointed emergency financial manager of Detroit's public schools. Since being appointed in 2009, Bobb has uncovered wide-spread abuse including over 3,800 unauthorized dependents on employee health-insurance rolls, a $1.3 billion school budget that was not being managed by a chief financial officer, a $332 million budget deficit, and sparsely populated schools with declining enrollment.
But I have started out on this journey and I am not turning back. I will try to prove that I can lose weight if I set my heart and mind to it and I will embrace every single features along the way before I get to my goal. It will probably a fabulous journey or a tiring and long-running one. And I’m hungry every single minute of the day because I exercise and I can’t eat to my heart’s content so that I will lose weight. Such a vicious cycle for a foodie like me, I tell you.
Just ran across the Dutch version of The Beggar’s Opera which they’ve renamed Schaduwzijde (something like Shadow Side).
There is a place for these kind of beverages; I would have felt positively out of place at the outskirts of Wrigleyville in Chicago drinking anything other than tallboys of Old Style, or hunkering down at a townie bar in Rochester and ordering Bud over Genny. And truth be told, Utica Club is actually a decent beverage.
Best New Play COLLABORATORS at the Cottesloe
The process is fairly easy with my little Makita hand sander.
“You’re wrong,” he said, his voice filtered through the mask and more sinister for it. He didn’t move, though.
Cornelius Bumpus & Chris Potter: saxophones
I also got some awesomely cool Harry Potter themed candy. It's a chocolote frog. I was seriously freaking out about that. I don't think I could go two minutes without saying something like "It's a chocolate frog! Isn't that the coolest thing ever dad?" I don't think my dad really knew what to say about this though. He hasn't read the Harry Potter books but he has seen the movies so at least it might have made some sense to him, but my mom hasn't seen the movies or read the books so she was probably wondering what was so exciting about it. But what's not exciting about that? It's comes with a collectable wizard card and everything (I got Professor McGonagall)!!!
In reflecting on the past several months and on this year in general, I find that Thanksgiving is a time to ask these questions (see my Thanksgiving post) once again. That article was written some years ago, but I find myself returning to these questions and pondering them anew every year.
Projected score: 145-122
He handed me the other half. I took it and gave him my paw to say thank you. I hurried away to where I’d put the first half of the biscuit and I settled down to enjoy the reunited halves of my treat.
As mentioned earlier, many cupcakes were on sale especially by kids and lots of brownies including the funny kind. I saw one guy selling huge hash brownies. Should’ve captured that in a photo. He was obviously enjoying himself.
1 1/4 sticks (10 tablespoons) very cold (frozen is fine) unsalted butter, cut into tablespoon-size pieces
56 little
- Yup we will be there this year. We played last year but Rachel had a broken hand so we just played old hardcore/punk covers and she just sang. It was interesting, Haha.
Sony Mobile has just announced the free OS upgrade to all of its Xperia 2011 devices to Android 4.0 (Ice Cream Sandwich). The video above shows how the upgrade is going to take place on your Xperia devices.
“Its not?” asked Marlene.
Shigeru’s senpai and also the chairman of Goujoken, she gives Shigeru the stapler at the start of the story; she dreams of becoming a nurse and since she is the last member of the gojouken she made Shigeru help her to spread the club before being disbanded as it was also an “illegal” club being its advisorless and has only one member which is her. Which quite surprised the school as shes a perfect student and is also school idol.
Your complete and utter lack of fashion sense
Satan must have thought he was accomplishing something by at least keeping Paul constantly on the move – but that was exactly what God wanted.
God do you hear me? Please, please hear me!!! I can't do this! I need something. I feel so alone. I miss Dustin and he is only in the other room. Apart, we are not as strong.
and my hopes are weapons that I’m still learning how to use right
“Feel ten years younger (clean up)”
'Til then!
Today welcomes the first day of summer and to celebrate I gave Maribel a little bubble gum blowing lesson. She then reminded me that it is practically impossible for a kid to not pop someone else's bubbles. Nice.
I was reading an article recently on food cravings, which was very interesting, as I have often wondered why there are some foods we desire more than others and the reasons why.
Because this fat, ugly, inconsiderate piece of human sewage is trying to make herself out to be the victim! She says she felt "disrespected" when other passengers reminded her that she was in a "quiet" car which meant. . . NO GODDAMN CELL PHONES!
Then we drove across the parking lot (hey-it was very cold so we felt justified) to see No Strings Attached. That's the new Natalie Portman and Ashton Kutcher movie. I had very mixed feelings about the movie because I feel Ashton gets a little out of control sometimes and Natalie is so serious in most of her roles that I didn't think I could relate to her being in a romcom. My verdict-it was cute and funny, and quite inappropriate at times. Definitely don't see this if you don't find cursing and slight vulgarity ok.
Before to joining this group, I was living with Jk and Biga in a house, where the neighbours were mostly Brahmin and Royal families. The atmosphere was cool and energetic with morning bells from temples, birds singing melodious songs and children playing in the verandas. We used to cook at home and used to chitchat and do mischief.
Names/Dates – Tent stitch (Silk Lame’ Braid SL68)
Yes! This way you will be notified if there has been a recall.
But I know they could see that in my face, in my eyes, in the way I lived my life.
he wants her to wear his shades,
not a bad thing for me since it exposes two shelves.
Please listen to this beautiful song by Casting Crowns, "I Heard the Bells on Christmas Day" . . . Enjoy and have a beautiful Christmas!
DO IT!
My best friend planted the seed in my head that I should run a 1/2 marathon with her in November. It would give me about 6 months to train...which would probably be enough for me to finish the race with a combo of walking and running within a respectable time. I don't know if I could do it logistically, or financially, but I like the idea. It has inspired me to, at least, pretend as if that is my goal.
May 1, 2012 – A magnitude 4.9 earthquake has struck Wyoming at a depth of 10 km (6.2 miles), the quake hit at 17:11:18 UTC Tuesday 1st May 2012…NOTE: The USGS has removed this earthquake 30 min after publishing the above details. Wyoming…article & videoLINK
My family owns a Chinese restaurant, Chee’s Chinese Cuisine, which has been voted best in the Berkshires three years running now and naturally I am pretty proud of this. This year there was an article in the paper on how it was celebrating its 25 year anniversary. I thought this was admirable and considerably impressive but then I read this article on a restaurant with a 100 year history that was about to close because it couldn’t afford the necessary renovations and upgrades it needed to meet particular standards.
Najib did just that a few days ago in an interview with the International Investor, an independent research group.
One of my favourite lines of the film by character Thomas Leroy is this :
While the whole squad embra ced his ideals of possession football and a relentless high pressing game – with the exception of one or two high-profile players who subsequently found themselves marginalised – his greatest achievements were in the defensive phase. Stephan Lichsteiner was the only significant addition made to a backline that conceded 47 goals last year, yet this season under Conte Juventus have allowed just 19 – 13 fewer than anyone else in the division. The clean sheet against Cagliari was their 21st of the season – a club record.
Sadly, Malcolm likely possessed unacknowledged motivation as well: as he gained his toddler mobility, young Bâri′ would become more and more visible. He’d be playing outdoors. Enrolling in school. Getting his voice. Becoming his own person. He’d even be asking his mother questions about his father.
A definite Double Thrill – first in realising I had not lost the Dunoon Mug, it is just waiting for me in Norfolk, and second, in finding something attractive I had quite forgotten about. Result!
Thanks for Reading
But cop a big ear too, to Wilber Morris and Denis Charles - just LARGE talents, that couldn't be unmusical if they tried.
Does your heart burn with a passion for God? Have you confessed all known sin? Do you tolerate any doubtful habits? Do you listen for the Holy Spirit’s voice? Do people around you even know you are a follower of Jesus? Today is the first day of the rest of your life. Follow Jesus today.
People are also saying that, in developed nations, women voluntarily choose to have breast implants. While that is true in most cases (I’ve heard of parents paying for breast implants for their teenage daughters which is disgusting and negligent to say the least), mutilation of women in developing nations sometimes happens by choice, as well, out of fear of the social implications. Unfortunately, it also happens against women’s and girls’ free will. Neither is truly free will. If we as a society send messages to women and girls that they are inadequate, ugly, or less “feminine” if they don’t have large breasts, then the potential self-loathing or lack of self-esteem may drive women to the surgeon’s office. I’d say that this is less-than-voluntary and more like brainwashing. We’re bombarded with images of women in the media who look more like cartoon characters than human beings. Is it any surprise than women feel they can’t measure up? No human being can.
I could see myself stretched out on a metal slab. It felt like I was viewing myself from outside my body. I lay very still staring unfocused at the bright light over head. Around me the room was circular in shape, the walls and floor also made of metal gleamed under the harsh lights. A strange scent stung my nostrils a sweet antiseptic smell. I could see a shadowy form standing beside me, I struggled to see through the cloudy film that was slowly blinding me, and tried to bring the image into focus. I wanted to raise my head to get a better look, but my muscles were frozen. I lowered my gaze down to where the thing had taken hold of my wrist. He looked like he was checking my pulse. I knew there wasn’t one, my heart had stopped beating, my blood deprived of oxygen was slowly thickening, and congealing inside of me. I could just make out three long spidery fingers attached to a shrunken gray arm. The sight filled me with dread, I wanted to run, to flee from what I was seeing, but I couldn’t move. I started sobbing for the thing to get away from me, but all I could manage was weak mewing sounds. My stomach twisted into oily knots as the thing came into full view.
BLITZER: Let’s continue on this subject.
You glance, we melt
Using a toddy, the good folks at the Commonplace cold-pressed some Sumatra Mandheling, one quart to be exact, which I added (after a quick boil and cooling) to the porter while transferring it to secondary. This method was chosen to reduce the addition of tannins that would be produced during the steeping of the coffee. We'll see how it turns out shortly.
Here is another Mother's Day card that we designed this year.
Grandmother's names? Kristin and Olga
One of the major tasks for a T person is “coming out” which is the process of disclosing their sexual orientation. Family culture, level of others’ knowledge of sexual diversity, and others’ level of affirmation toward LGBTQ people are key factors in this process, which can range from smooth and supportive to destructive and wounding. Often people seek support in the LGBTQ community before they go through this process, and although much change is being made, many people still have very difficult experiences in this disclosure, particularly from close family members.
In both cases, the circumstances may be of equal importance. In fiction, as in life, we are expected to restrain our instincts for risky long-term ventures even though we are applauded for acting on impulse when the danger is immediate.
And that is how the berating begins… again. I am so tired of the questions. And they are always the same questions over and over and over. I finally asked why he keeps asking the same thing over and over? The answer isn’t going to change within the hour, or even the day. He said because he is looking for the straight answer. The truth. The problem is, no matter what I say, or how I answer, unless it is what he believes in his head, I am lying. Now. To be honest, I am not always completely forthcoming. I don’t outright lie but I try to protect his feelings. Sometimes I just can’t take the big blow up that I know will ensue.
Today we mourn the passing of our Sharp AL-800 copier. It was with us for ten years, and it served us well, making approximately 20,000 copies (it has an internal counter somewhere, but we've never seen it). Its paper feeder recently broke off inside, and we knew the end was near. We tried to copy issue #33 of OPE with it, but it was no use. The paper just jammed. I have removed its toner cartridge to give to a friend who owns Sharpie's twin, and Sharpie sits in the hallway, gutted.
So what exactly did you miss?
This is the most important advice I want to give on this subject. If you decide to get yourself a web site and trust me, you will at some point, don't dig yourself in a hole with a designer who is going to leave the country and leave you no way of updating the information on your own.
It is probably the case that perjury is the important crime most committed, but least prosecuted.
Corrupted Firehawk – Glory of the Firelands Raider
After putting them down… I guess now I should say “in” for a nap, I listened to them laugh and have an absolute BALL for hours. Their doors were shut and I checked on them frequently just to make sure they weren’t ripping down the walls or hanging from the ceiling fans. I actually took a video camera in with me each time I checked on them and got some hilarious footage I hope to share sooner than later! My biggest fear of the entire toddler bed transition was that they would try to come out of their rooms. I pictured babies laying on the floor, fingers reaching under the crack of the door and them crying and begging to come out. Boy was I wrong (man those words have been used on this blog a lot lately). They don’t argue a bit to go to bed/nap now and enjoy playing in their rooms together!
With Skin Color & Shirt Color: Arms (make 2, don't stuff)
He has worked so hard to improve. He has taken full accountability. He has had lots of therapy. He takes medication. He is willing to admit his shortcomings and try to see how it affects others. He knows now that he sees the world differently and is willing to ask others if his behavior is okay, if his stand on something is out of the norm.
As territory is normally defined in the “definitions” section of the licence, as shown earlier, it needs only be denoted by a capital T in the licence grant. This is the preferred technique, as otherwise the licensee grant paragraph will be needlessly encumbered.
ain't life grand?
True an NDP opposition is a major improvement over a Liberal opposition but a majority government that barely listened to the Opposition when it was in the minority will ignore the Opposition in majority.Yes, the party that bent over backwards to gain the support of the opposition, and got a stab in the back for its troubles, is now free to tell them to take a hike. And yet, in victory, Harper still found the resolve and the goodwill to offer the olive branch to his losing opponents - or at least their voters. Would the NDP have done the same?
300g (11oz) castor sugar
He pushed his sloppy fingers into her mouth as he plunged his raging cock inside her cunt, and she let out a choking scream as she came again, shuddering against him. The strange tightness of his cock in her pussy and the plug in her ass was astonishing. The lower half of her face was covered in her own juice and his rude squeezing fingers and he lowered his head and bit the plump top of her left tit and growled into her skin. Thrusting and biting and moaning low and deep he filled her with hot bursts of his thick cream. She clutched at his thick hard arms and rolled on wave after wave of a pleasure so hard it was painful.
“I’m sure it will continue. When we moved from Channel 4 to Channel 5, it enabled us to make changes that we couldn’t in the past. We have been a lot more confident this time around in how we drive the stories forward and make entertaining shows.”
b. We also receive life only through the power of the Spirit (Romans 8:11). The earlier verses of Romans 8 talk about this present life as lived by the Holy Spirit but there is coming a day when the Spirit will give life to our mortal bodies. How can I be confident that I will rise again? Because Jesus rose again and I will be raised by that same power.
She has the guy. The terrorists have been taken care of and she has a shot at becoming popular.
Lucky, lucky, lucky me.
These were all taken between February-April, in San Francisco.
But I am being a snot--I warned you I am spoiled! Because really the sight of lavender springing out of an ancient wall, side-swiped by the afternoon light, was worth weeding through the groups lead by bull-horned earnest guides.
Future Shop guy: “So you like the TV?”
“Yes, like them,” Sundance said. “There are others, but not many. It’s hard not to feel inferior when you work with beings faster, stronger, and smarter than you. You’re one of those humans too, Jack. Probably one of the most well known.”
It was important that this be made early so it could sit for a while and all the flavors could marry together. Because I was 20 something the booze was always important.
I'm taking a couple of days off of blogging to spend time with my husband who's on Christmas vacation this week. But while I'm away, we're blessed to have a visitor.
Today is Good Friday. Today, we celebrate the One whose breath on our souls brings life. The One who gave everything so that we could be free. The One whose grace doesn’t just drip on us, but it washes over us like a tidal wave, leaving us completely and totally clean. Every sin, every addiction, every ounce of bitterness, every hurt is gone. They are washed away in the flood of His love.
Thirdly - On the editorial page, I find it courageous, non-partisan, able and free to attack abuses in both parties. My ideal. In specially difficult situations which test courage, character and capacity, I find the Eagle rises to the importance of the occasion and brings out great latent strength in reflecting the moral sense and public opinion of the community, which it largely creates.”
﻿ The tablet requires no software to install, and plugs directly into the USB port like a mouse. To operate it, you hover the pen above the tablet to move the cursor. To left-click, you touch the pen to the drawing surface, and to drag you drag it along the drawing surface. The upper part of the button on the pen lets you right-click, and the lower part lets you middle click. The basic operation of it takes minutes to master.
Maybe I’m just finding people who are and always have been pro-Bradford, but I believe there are more and more of us about… and, unlike me, they’re doing something tangible about it. In my search for culture, I’ve come across more and more and more of these people: they are the movers, the shakers and, above all, the do-ers of Bradford. They are here, they are wonderful, and they deserve our support.
3. Apps: Selection vs. Control
The sequence does so much more, too, because it addresses that idea floating around out here in the real world that James Bond is no longer relevant in a post-Cold War world, and then spends the next 90 minutes proving that he’s as important as ever.
I know I have said this before, but I am grateful.
999 D-XI/19(B)/1987. “Technology and Freedom.” Lindenwood College, St. Charles, Missouri.
The ninth image is just the original photo that I uploaded.
“After that we just need to sit back and wait.”
So, when I found this bag at the local GW, I thought it might work. It has tons of function, is light weight, and is comfortable to wear. And navy handbags are definitely making a comeback in the higher end stores.
Even healthy relationships can use a boost now and then. You may need a boost if you feel disconnected from your partner or like the relationship has gotten stale. If so, find a fun, simple activity you both enjoy, like going on a walk, and talk about the reasons why you want to be in the relationship. Then, keep using healthy behaviors as you continue dating.
Mr. Quatrevaux argues that the city doesn’t need a Traffic Court and should fold it into Municipal Court for a savings of $2.5 million a year. The work now done by four Traffic Court judges could be handled by a hearing officer, he said. Baton Rouge’s single court of 5 judges managed a caseload slightly higher than did New Orleans’ 12 judges.
Here’s a peak at the fabric. It needs to be ironed, but then I’m going to practice Susan K’s method for inserting a couture zipper. I bet you thought I forgot about that class! I’m slowly making progress, but I’ll post about that later when I reach my next milestone. Until then, I am going to finish this UFO and my pyjama party sew-a-long!
But surely that church is Catholic, they pointed out.
Sorry bout that, Del. No offense intended. Keep bustin’ out those amazing tracks. I promise I’ll never flash harass you again.
Some of life’s most intriguing questions are doomed never to be answered.
Like finding one sweet clover.
Sue, my friend, asked my advice on a coffee cup she was planning to buy for a mutual friend. I said I thought she'd love it, that whenever she drank from it, she would be reminded of our times in Paris.
“Wait, wha-?” said Lord Bath, suddenly finding himself in an arena with a gladiator bearing down on him.
If you haven’t realized yet, this is one of those writing memes and this one was started by Renee. A. S. Jacobson. God bless her, I could do with a few of these to help reduce the non existent creative tension surrounding me. Anyways back to the topic.
I'm sure it will be a few weeks before I settle on something.
Freud (1856 – 1939):
Aye a blog meet. Like folks do these days an'a.
I don’t always know the answers to questions put to me. Often confused I will stumble, pause to think and wave my hands about in trying to explain what it was I meant or what it was I planned. Sometimes when I am asked a question, and especially if it comes from Steve who is trying to point me in a direction that I am not even aware of yet, it takes me days to get to the answer and understand why the question was asked of me in the first place.
The irony here is that most of the answers to "how are things going?" questions can be found right here on my blog in the WHAT'S NEW! section. I know a blog is impersonal but corners have to be cut. If you've read that section and still have questions, that's fine. Ask away. I really appreciate knowing that the person has checked with the blog first.
in foreign countries, miraculously providing them with glorious revelations of
I have a feeling that I will be just as outraged as E.
Mary Jo
She has a lovely voice.
1 findin'
I never want any man I’m interested in to think I can’t keep home, but because I don’t have a lot of company very often, sometimes I’m not as vigilant on keeping everything perfect. So I have to be in control of visits if I’m dealing with a local man. He can’t come over unannounced and not unless I think my house is right.
That these expectations come my way
Two months ago I wrote about trust from the perspective of parents trusting their children. There is another side of trust: children trusting their parents. If you feel like it's hard to trust your children think about what it's like to be a child. Children are completely dependent on the adults in their life. If your child doesn't trust you they don't have the option of grounding you or punishing you or creating consequences for your behavior. It's daunting to think of all the different areas of life, all the little things, all the possible ways that we can betray our child's trust. And if we screw that up it will affect our child's relationships for a long time, possibly for the rest of their life. Are you worthy of your child's trust?
Ladies, it is time to reclaim your body!
In an interview with the Los Angeles Times, Connelly observed that “the best books in this genre are the ones that have raised the book to a greater level. Yes, they’re puzzles and entertainment and whodunits, but it’s the writers who can use that as a lens to look at something else, to explore some kind of social or political angle, who are the ones I like the most.” The Closers is one such novel; the pointed social commentary adds depth and substance to the novel. Connelly the journalist is always behind Connelly the mystery writer.
Why he got this, we don't know.....
Abraham Alreser Schoenberg (Al Shean, b. 1868) had been a messenger, pants presser, and butcher boy before forming the Manhattan Quartette in 1888 with Charley Harris, George Brennan and Sam Curtis. The team played Bowery music halls and had at least one engagement at at Tony Pastor’s 14th Street. After a few years of this, he found some legit work. In 1891 he was cast in Apple Orchard Farm, at the Windsor Theatre, which closed after two weeks. His next show The County Fair gave him a run of three years. From 1895-1900 he was in the Manhattan Comedy Four with Sam Curtis, Arthur Williams and Ed Mack of Harrigan and Hart’s old troup. The group sang songs like “Sweet Molly Moran” and “After the Ball” in four part harmony and did comedy sketches, many of them written by Shean. The team was big time and toured the country, but Shean left to from a partnership with Charles L. Warner, with whom he performed through 1904.
There is much to learn and hear for the guidance of the post modern church. There is sin in the church today that needs to be dealt with. I hear of adulterous affairs going on between couples within some local congregations; and if these sins and others are not dealt with then those churches will fall.
I am a “list person”.
Sarah's Silks - Sarah's Silks makes playsilks, dress-up and toys for imaginative play. Open ended, simple and beautiful Come see our new web site for specials, stories, and ideas.
Dr. Rob Robinson, President, USDLA Board of Directors, noted that, “It is an honor to recognize our Hall of Fame inductees for their commitment to educational excellence.”
Shock
and other produce. Students will be offered more fresh fruits, whole
Katniss and Gale aren’t hungry enough: Perhaps what bothered me most about Gale was how much of a well-fed gym rat he looks. Likewise, but in another way, Katniss; while she talks about gaining weight in the lead-up to the Games in the book, it is still understood that the usual scraping to get by in D12 makes her wiry at best. Instead, Lawrence’s Katniss is obviously quite curvy and womanly in her training outfit and chariot entrance scenes. This portrayal of both is probably a good move from a marketing (and subtle sexualizing) perspective, but struck me as out of place (Peeta gets a pass in my book as he is the son of a baker . . . and those carbs). Both Lawrence and Helmsworth should have gone the route of Christian Bale in The Machinist or Viggo Mortensen in The Road ahead of filming.
yes I have had a couple beers tonight, what of it?
CITIES: Hong Kong skyline. PHotographer unknown.
my sweet, handsome & talented husband helped me put together.
P: Depends on what is for dinner.
Continue screaming as mom releases your hand stuck in the jacket. Don’t stop screaming. Scream for at least two more minutes just to let her know how traumatized you were. Oh, here’s the cat. Hi, cat. Wait. Remember about screaming. Scream. Scream. Good. Cars! Go play with cars.
I thought of getting all philosophical about how we parents sometimes forget the people we were pre-kids and become "So & So's Mom" or "So & So's Dad". I was going to sing the importance of retaining some of you, the person. I was going to warn against becoming only you, the mom. I know the experts say to take a class, take up a hobby, learn a new skill, get out and exercise, make a little time, every day, for you. However, in the real world, I also know it's sometimes impossible. For those with tight finances, it's usually not affordable to just "take a class" or buy supplies for your hobby. For those whose spouse works long hours or is deployed, how are you supposed to find time to go to the gym or even read a book some days? And is it really so horrible to put your life on hold, so to speak, to become so & so's mother? So & so will only be little for a short while. You've got your whole life ahead of you to take up skydiving, poker, knitting, painting, tennis, or whatever it is you want to do. Just a thought.
That’s the entirety of the Browns’ draft. A lot of places give the Browns a “B” grade; I’m okay with that, sort of. They “filled” most of our needs, in that they got warm bodies who wear the right uniform number. Hughes still baffles me, and I like the idea of an uber-fast wideout, but we really needed somebody with more overall ability. Schwartz is an example of drafting for need over best player available; I like the idea and the player, just not where we took him. A couple of character guys here too. Overall, the Browns got three Day-1 starters (assuming Weeden gets the job on day one), good depth at defensive tackle and linebacker, and a freakin’ huge guard. The only skill player I’m unreservedly excited about is Trent Richardson. The only player I’m unreservedly angry about is Hughes. (Fun fact: he was second to last among all DTs who were graded! And we took him in the third round!)
So the content of this and my other blog has been exported to WordPress. Now, I considered WP when I first started blogging, but Blogger was recommended for technophobes or IT plebs like me because it is simple. But, Wordpress has got a lot more features, which was very daunting at first, but their guide is very easy to follow. And, I could export all my old content. Which I have. It will of course stay here until .... well forever really. Until I choose to delete it. Which may well be never.
Jaggery - 1 tbsp (optional)
Here are some problems you might run into:
For a few weeks each spring, though, it will be the brilliant orange blooms that make the front yard of My Florida Backyard the showiest place on the block. We hope to add some other colors of hippeastrum in years to come, but right now, we're pretty happy with blooms we've got.
I heard most of the branded fashion retailers include Uniqlo, Zara, Guess, Espirit and F.O.S are opening there. Besides that, Department store like Parkson, Fitness First, Harvey Norman, MPH Bookstore, Daiso, Courts and the very first Urbanfresh supermarket are gonna be opening there too. Furthermore, Golden Screen Cinemas (GSC) and Wangsa Bowl are also expected to open in late June.
Audubon bird count for Bastrop County.
And yes, I still thank God for the birds that sing.
'You'll get to college on pennies, nickels, dimes and
Father, we come into Your presence with thanksgiving in our hearts and give You praise. We ask you to be merciful to our land because You are a loving, forgiving God. You have called on us, Your children, to be a people of prayer, devotion, and denial of self. We pray for our land to repent of neglect and defiance of Your holy commands. In the name of Jesus we come against the powers of darkness that seek to engulf the light of Your salvation that brings help, hope, and forgiveness to sin sick souls and secures their eternal dwelling in heaven. Help us not to grow weary in our intercession, for we want to be faithful in prayer so that, at a future date, we will witness the harvest of souls. We pray for Your will to be accomplished in the Name of Jesus. Amen.
* Any other comments/observations/general mind-blowing information you’d like to add?
I enjoy all genres of film, but my preference is for the smaller, independent productions. Movies like Sideways, Bottle Rocket, (500) Days of Summer, City Island and Dan in Real Life come to mind. Before seeing many of those I had heard little to nothing about them, but had great experiences with each.
Kate Pepper has it all . . . a razor-sharp intellect, perfect health, stunning beauty, a wildly successful career, and all the money she can spend. Or rather, she thinks she has it all.
Lord, Lord I’ll be delivered
Historic Preservation
Ed Sheeran (The only ginger dude I'd run away with) is playing a gig at Doncaster Dome sometime in November, and tickets are on sale through the website. So, giddy as schoolgirls, Paul and I rush online to get our tickets. Anxiously, we wait for the website to load, and patiently we search for where to book these tickets, eyes gleaming with glorious hope...
Google-owned You Tube in brazen SOPA-style attack
I'm happy to say that we've been in our current home for over five years...and, as I already said, we won't be going anywhere soon. Unless, of course, something changes. But if it does, and we end up moving in the near future, I know I have at least two friends we can count on for help.
5. Choose your template - 3, 4, or 5 photos (I chose 3 above)
and I bear it no more,
I love tiaras so much, so I put them first! You can buy tiaras anywhere, but my favorite one is the one pictured above from Jesus Diamante. I often wear my tiara late at night when I'm writing or sewing ♥
Radio- always tuned for BBC Radio 4
be the best way to describe Black Tea. Now Chai is
Linked to:
I stood on my toes and kissed my husband, in the rain, under a tree during a storm in Paris. We both laughed. What does a little bit of rain matter when you're in love in a city that's designed for such a thing?
As some of you may know I'm currently working on acquiring autographs from all the members of the 2005 Astros World Series roster. I'm trying my best to get the autographs either in person or TTM. I've already received a few of the bigger names (Bagwell and Oswalt) from previous in person signings and some of the lesser known players through TTM. However, some of the players are harder to obtain than others. Some guys don't like to sign TTM much, some have retired and their addresses aren't in any databases yet.
titled “Things I’m afraid to tell you” that EZ turned into a movement. The idea is to create more transparency on blogs. Sharing the bad, the ugly, the awkward along with all things pretty and nice. How often do you read blogs and think to yourself, wow that person has it so easy. Or their life seems perfect. Well obviously no one’s life is perfect. It’s just so much easier to share the good stuff instead of the stuff you’re not so proud of.
We enjoyed one of those perfect days spending time with long-time friends, comfortable enough to enjoy each other’s company or just spend some reflection time, if we felt like it!
I hope you take the time every now and then to visit my sponsors’ sites. I do spend a lot of time working on this little blog and although I don’t think billionaire status is in my future, it sure is nice that I can make a little money for diapers (and more diapers . . .). I’m flattered that there are companies that believe in my site and content enough to associate their company name with it.
Our 15 pound turkey plus stuffing equals around 17 pounds. Cooking time would be (15 X 25) + 25 = 400 minutes divided by 60 = 6 hours 40 minutes.
- features:
-o- Brian and I adopted our cats Dinah and Sabina from a bona fide crazy cat lady, and then became so besotted with them that we let them get away with anything… that and they find themselves featured in many blog posts. Among these are: Sabina has taken up residence in a shopping bag, Curled up kitties, Kitties in Sweatshirts and Picture Show: the Best of Dinah and Sabina Together.
I learned many things this weekend, but foremost among them are:
In other news, Creative Cuts and More has extended their design team call through Monday, July 6th. They carry all sorts of wonderful papers and dies. I would definitely recommend it to anyone interested in getting your foot in the door designing. International applicants are accepted, too!
R17-21- Sc in each (18)
The man watches me as I struggle with the landing. Inside the hall it is somewhat dark and I wasn't making much headway, so the man proceeds to come down the stairs toward me. He continues speaking to me as he makes his approach. Mistaking me for someone else perhaps, he reaches out to me. My hand latches onto his arm. He hesitates for a second, and then roughly squeezes my breast. His breathe smells strong of cheap whiskey.
AAHAAHAHAHAHAHAAHAAAAAAAAAAAHHHHAAAAAAAA
Strange, surreal and impassioned, Charlie Chaplin's The Great Dictator is part satire, part slapstick, part indignant humanitarian rage. It's still an edgy film seventy years on, because it's always rare to see a gutsy director take a direct jab at current events. Hitler invaded Poland in 1939. A year later, The Great Dictator came out. And no one in this film had any idea how the war would turn out (!).
If you'd like to help me get the word out of my next release, The Backworlds, I'd be most appreciative. Sign up below for the launch party, and I'll see to it you're emailed what you need to post up.Will give you a break when AtoZ ends. Post up any time the week of May 7th. And you don't have to visit anybody. The Linky link is so I can be organized.
Celery (organic): On sale for $1.69/bunch, used 1/5 = $.34
So I set him about his history and, some time later – after, in fact, another trip to the garage – went to check on him. He was deep in Shaman lore and the Cro-Magnon cave paintings. I twitched. Whither Tudors?
* University of Munich (Germany)
House flooded with child looking close to death.
Because these once-dear friends have been on my mind as I've remembered our lemonade stand days, I was inspired to look for them on Facebook. Wouldn't you know that I've found one of them---Rosemarie---and I've sent her a friend request. What fun it will be if we can reconnect with one another after all these years.
And keep rolling on….
Despite the stress and pressure I've been under lately, though, I'm excited. There are some situations where I'm just not sure what's going to happen, but I'm doing my best to simply trust that God is going to work things out. I'm trying to keep my focus on the new opportunities and new chances for growth that are coming my way. I'll definitely be sharing more about them here - watch for details on the new adventures coming soon!
As long as one is alive, hope remains. The soul is yet in the body. You can still be saved. As Paul spoke to the seamen he knew they still had hope. They may have been despairing but God is still there and is still in control.
Level 28: Weapon ATT: +28, Accuracy: +10%, Proc Rate: 59%, Deals 244% damage 2 times.
We scattered through palms and bamboo like kids! A misty hundred-foot waterfall careened onto a pool, dotted with butterflies. After gulping aguapanela, sugarcane in lemonwater, we hiked through hibiscus and banana trees to reach a second, hidden cascade. Jenna sipped honeysuckle stems and watched giant ants hauling leaves. Lunch silenced our constant chatter as we slurped sancocho – soup of yucca, corn, plantain, and cilantro. Our host commented, “La Virgen paso”, (The Virgin passes), a Colombian colloquialism for a sudden hush.
So what are you thoughts on SOPA and PIPA? Are you pro, con or somewhere in the middle? I would love to hear your thoughts or proposed solutions. Interested in what you can do or how you can learn more? Contact your congressperson, follow the Electronic Frontier Foundation on Twitter @EFF, sign the "Stop the E-Parasite Act" petition (here), or you can get more information by visiting http://www.americancensorship.com/
02 - Blind Willie McTell
7. Mention this giveaway on your blog, either on a post or on your sidebar. Let me know/leave a link. (+3)
· They consider themselves the “Defenders of the Faith”
Why a cement quarry?
If you live in a home, condo, or apartment with decor and/or gardens and/or a terrace/patio you feel are worthy of national newsstand-quality magazine publication, or if you are an interior designer/decorator who would like your own home or a client project considered, please CONTACT ME with a short written description. I would also like to see a blog post or website link that includes photos if you have them, but please do not e-mail me photos unless I request them from you. If based on your written description and blog/website link photos I feel your home would be of interest to the magazines I write for, I will contact you. PLEASE NOTE: I only submit homes that are decorated in the cottage/country/shabby chic/French country/antique-collector style.
Two Staplers.
He seems to want to be part of things but doesn't have the muscles yet to sit up so he gets mad that he gets left laying on the floor.I notice him trying to sit up in his bouncer chair. Good luck buddy!
That’s it! It’s simple. The Giveaway will continue until 8 PM on Thursday, March 8 and is open to everyone.
Gather your gardening and planting supplies in one place. Replace old and broken tools. Perhaps you might even get a gardening caddy to store your good gardening tools.
Knowing that this is the last book of the trilogy, there’s still a lot of loose ends to tie up including Cassel dealing with the Feds, his turbulent relationship with Lila and the trouble going on with his mom. Holly Black manages to do all that plus give us one incredible ending. I loved the ending and it was perfect and fitting for the two characters after all they’ve been through. After reading it, I couldn’t imagine it ending any other way and satisfying me the way it did.
Calgary Mayor Naheed Nenshi is on the front cover of the May edition of Reader’s Digest. The five part article is also available on-line
INFERNO
The caption reads 'The Residence of N.W. Stuyvesant' which formerly stood in 8th Street, between 1st and 2nd Avenue', one property on the land estate of the Stuyvesants during the 18th century. (NYPL) I've seen this same illustration differently labeled, dated 1800 and called simply 'the Bowery House'.
Judging by the former Bush employees who he has lined up to work for him across the board, it’s W’s ideas he will most likely be bringing us if elected.
2 skilled
Hope you are having a good week, I am fighting a cold at the moment, I hope I feel better for tomorrow!!
Do you run a bus?
Reconciling is all about setting things back right, the way that they should be. In order. Restored. At peace. Jesus is the only One who can reconcile a person back to God. His blood poured out on the cross was the payment for sin. Praise God that Jesus makes us holy, faultless and blameless before God. A person who has been reconciled to God will continue with a steadfast hope in Christ.
Our beloved country was bleeding! But in the final end, a negotiated settlement was successfully achieved.
Hello Ladies! Long time no read.
I guess the only positive thing out of this is that he at least didn't vomit as he did in past trials. And I'm glad he loves his whole grain drink from Trader Joe's so much. Just not sure what I will do when the military decides to move us and there might not be a Trader Joe's around, ack.
What he wrote was the speech he would have given if he had been the speaker at the ceremony. It was a good speech and about the only thing that made me want to cry. The part that stuck out the most was what he said about parents, what they would do now that their kids were moving on, as he concluded. He mentioned all that they had given up for us, how they had changed their lifestyles and made choices to accommodate us and in the process found that it was more rewarding to live for others than just themselves. What he said wouldn’t be true for all parents but it is for mine. Though it may sound cliché it struck me as true. I would say that my parents live meaningful lives even if they haven’t achieved greatness. Even while they have sacrificed for their children they also never lost a sense of self or confused our lives with theirs.
A Department for Education spokesman said: “No school can ever afford to rest on its laurels.
You remember the day we bought the bedding, right?...
But no-one can calculate the possibilities. At least if you try to do something, you know the outcome. You may fail, but at least you know the outcome. If you don’t try, you will never know and will always ponder on what might have happened if only… if only…
Since the Posse Comitatus Act covers both the Army and Air Force, this would seem blatantly illegal…but really is anything illegal anymore for the Feds? The Intel Hub link has additional pictures.
Do you lament for my broken legs? Because wicked people will eat you? Because of the drought that will strike you when sacrifices to the gods cease?
This Kanji looks a bit like the one for fish but you might as well just remember it as is because it is quite complex and distinct.
great discrepancy between:
My Opinion:
The balance between vision and reality is revisited many times throughout the narrative as the project unfolds. “Since when is being a dreamer a bad thing?” asks New York City Director of Planning Amanda Burden at one point in the process. “This is a city that is built on dreams. We should all be following dreams like this one.”
(Senate Armed Services Committee, 9/11/07)
I don’t want to be a thief of your time or attention. I only want to share with you some of my visual artwork and I hope that it will benefit you in some way.
1) Often used to describe somebody who is strong, it holds the most extreme definition of strength and power.
Apart from all those dramatic stuff, the show has some slapstick humor and bittersweet moments as well. They aren’t randomly inserted slap-stick that kill the mood, but are much appreciated moments of comic relief.
Apple Daily used the saga to draw comparison with Hong Kongers’ earlier outcry against a remark by Beijing Professor Kong that they are ‘running dogs’ of the British, prompting angry Hong Kongers to put up a full-page advertisement denouncing the mainland Chinese as ‘locusts’.
“Certainly not! It’s best not to let the children anywhere near dangerous equipment. No, it should be demonstrated by the teacher whilst the pupils watch and write about it. AND…” I held up my hand for increased dramatic effect, “The fun part is they get to draw a picture!”
OK, I normally do not do this. But it has been a rough three weeks... not with my class or the school... just rough overall. Plus, I have a migraine and am grumpy. I am telling you this because maybe I am overreacting here, but I just betcha that I have some other sub friends who have experienced similar things. My beef? The way subs are generally treated and talked about.
Corned beef. Cabbage. Potatoes.
Preheat the oven to 170C
Dull at first
-1/4 cup apple cider vinegar (really any vinegar will do, but apple has great health benefits)
drwxrwxr-x 4 root root 96 Oct 11 13:13 VRTSfspro
Wertheimer N, Leeper E. Possible effects of electric blankets and heated waterbeds on fetal development. Bioelectromagnetics 1986; 7: 13-22.
It was a journey out of some ridiculous sitcom episode. First, after some high-speed collating, I stood in line at Kinko’s for several minutes with a bunch of other people while the 5 employees ignored the line, angrily thinking of the Dave Chappelle PopCopy sketch. (Which is seriously hilarious. Check it out.) Then, I had to remind the Prius that we are in California and not the Midwest to get its GPS to work. Next, I made a mad dash down the freeway- that is, until I ran into a massive pile of traffic. Not commuter traffic, though- rubbernecker traffic. Some moron had apparently set the other side of the freeway on fire, and all these dumbass looky-loos had to slow down to check it out. This gave me time to discover that my papers didn’t really fit into the envelope I’d just purchased (damn it all!).
as we hold tight
I poured over my copy of Cliffs Notes, saw Spacey discuss the production on Charlie Rose, read every available page on Wikipedia and watched Pacino’s Looking for Richard. I find it all a bit hard to grasp, although I felt somewhat vindicated by the Pacino documentary. Early on, while trying to summarize the story, he loses his train of thought and says it’s no wonder people are put off by it.
that a silent rain
Boy, I have a lot I could write about these past few months and how this little challenge has affected me, and even impacted my family. And I will write about all that.
twila
These cakes work well with almost any topping, but I really do like the fresh fruit and the dark chocolate coffee!
Good Morning and happy Thursday. Well I must say I am bummed to not be at the gym working out. That means next week I will be in the gym every day trying to catch up! My daughter has no more green monsters in her nose. But she is still have to blow her nose constantly and coughing. If only I could hurry up and feel better and get back to normal.
US: Please mail checks in name of: Kathalijn Sprenger, 405 Eastview Drive, Bedford, IN 47421. Please write “Holiday Fund” in the memo.
Now for Holton’s responses, which were furnished by his campaign at my request:
I think I am going to have to pull out another pattern and some of my new thread that is not patiently waiting any longer to get on the hook.
Saurel-Cubizolles MJ, Romito P, García J. Description of maternity rights for working women in France, Italy and in the United Kingdom. Eur J Public Health 1993; 3: 1-6.
We are backstage with Raven and Tommy. Raven thought they should have killed them, Tommy said yes, but let’s stay with the plan. They promised Dixie they wouldn’t fight right now. Raven finally agrees, saying they will make a mistake.
1/3 cup fresh or bottled key lime juice
124×84,5cm
Some of you may know "John" as the little boy who was trampled
Could I make the suggestion that anyone reading this column who is part of any organisation which administers the provision of books, reading and ideas about books think about convening a conference or many conferences or a national conference organised around this matter? As a suggestion, perhaps the brief for the conference would be to create useful working blueprints for schools to use, adapt and develop. The cue or headline for such a conference could be the Ofsted recommendation. Again, I would suggest that those who have already worked up blueprints for this: the NUT, Booktrust, the Reading Agency, the National Literacy Trust and Calderdale (Deborah Bullivant), CLPE, UKLA, the Campaign for the Book, Just Read and anywhere else/anyone else could put this together.
I am also entering the card into this week's Paper Sundaes challenge 'Favourite hair colour combinations'. I can just about manage a tiny bit of shading on the face using two colours and at the moment for hair-colouring I play it safe with 'Caramel' and 'Tan' in the Promarkers range and 'Shale' if i want to go darker. On this image I used the 'Tan' marker solo.
First decide what kind of cycling you are looking forward to. If you are looking for a light weight bike that will take you wings while on longer weekend rides, tours or sporting events, go for a Road bike.
Answer the questions the “tagger” listed for you in their post,
recipe that my mother used every year
The Disenchantments by Nina LaCour: This is another male POV that is amazing, only not because it is... typical boy, I guess. I haven't yet figured out how to explain the voice in this one, but ultimately, it's like Colby feels so much that there's potentially a feminine quality to his voice at least compared to other male POV books and yet, that is not at all it. I loved his character, his voice, his motivations. The stupid things he does, and the bold things he does. His interactions with Bev, and everything between them, is just so stunningly done, with so much between the lines and not outright said, that this is definitely a book to read over and over.
Song o' the Insurance Men
I fed horses, then groomed and rode a sweet old paint named Cody, for whom I felt instant love and affection. Partly because he didn't—nay, couldn't—buck me off. Afterward, I gave him a shower. Think he liked it; he asked Bestie for my number . . .
D. Where a Community trade mark is not registered in colour, but the proprietor has used it extensively in a particular colour or combination of colours such that it has become associated in the mind of a significant portion of the public (in a part but not the whole of the Community) with that colour or combination of colours, is the colour or colours in which the defendant uses the sign complained of relevant in the global assessment of (i) likelihood of confusion under Article 9(1)(b) or (ii) unfair advantage under Article 9(1)(c) of Regulation 40/94? If so, how?
Maine and North Carolina have passed laws banning new hard stabilization along the shoreline. But property owners pay a heavy price for such laws. In March, a series of storms off of North Carolina eroded the beaches at Nags Head and Kill Devil Hills, on the Outer Banks, pitching several houses into the sea and damaging others so severely they were condemned.
3 tablespoons cooking oil
The heavy lock shifted with a loud metallic noise and the door swung open. A man with a long white coat stepped in and surveyed the room before dismissing the orderly and shutting the door. The room’s occupant was a one John Doe thirty five to forty years of age, height five feet ten inches, weight a hundred and seventy pounds brown hair and possibly brown eyes. It was difficult to determine what color hide behind the filmy discoloration they were now.
Since George Zimmerman has been accused of profiling based on race leading to the death of an individual of a race other than his own, the United States Justice Department and the FBI have been investigating a possible hate crime under federal law.
For dessert there was a tart of strawberries and cream, (I was pleased to note that the pastry 'fait a la maison' was no better than mine, I loath making pastry and have recently served up various inedible pastry dishes in an attempt to master it, don't ask me why, you can buy perfectly decent ready made pastry in every supermarket and most french cooks do!)
In the Old Covenant bread and wine were offered in a thanksgiving sacrifice as a sign of grateful acknowledgment to the Creator as the giver and sustainer of life. Melchizedek, who was both a priest and king (Genesis 14:18; Hebrews 7:1-4), offered a sacrifice of bread and wine. His offering prefigured the offering made by Jesus, our high priest and king (Hebrews 7:26; 9:11; 10:12). The remembrance of the manna in the wilderness recalled to the people of Israel that they live – not by earthly bread alone – but by the bread of the Word of God (Deuteronomy 8:3). At the last supper when Jesus blessed the cup of wine, he gave it to his disciples saying, “Drink of it, all of you, for this is my blood of the covenant, poured out for many for the forgiveness of sins” (Matthew 26:28). Jesus was pointing to the sacrifice he was about to make on the cross, when he would shed his blood for us – thus pouring himself out and giving himself to us – as an atoning sacrifice for our sins and the sins of the world. His death on the cross fulfilled the sacrifice of the paschal (passover) lamb whose blood spared the Israelites from death in Egypt. Paul the Apostle tells us that “Christ, our paschal lamb, has been sacrificed” (1 Corinthians5:7). Paul echoes the words of John the Baptist who called Jesus the “Lamb of God who takes away the sins of the world” (John 1:29). Jesus made himself an offering and sacrifice, a gift that was truly pleasing to the Father. He “offered himself without blemish to God” (Hebrews 9:14) and “gave himself as a sacrifice to God” (Ephesians 5:2).
One way to confirm your findings is to ask those Godly people that know you well. Ask them to read the definitions of the gifts that you selected and confirm whether they see this same gift in your life or not. Ask them what they think you need to improve on. Ask them to pray for you that you may have understanding and wisdom in using these gifts.
so good
We also have the Flourishes Timeless Tuesday blog button working properly again. If you need the code, check here.
Samsung and Apple are both expected to be able to maintain their sales in that country. The Korean company has powerful distribution, while Apple can rely on the power of its brand despite the iPhone being comparatively expensive.
Finally, I would like to make it clear that this does not close the door on my future participation in the show. I wish them well in the coming series, even though I’ll be watching Bill Oddie’s new ‘Owl Odyssey’ on BBC2."
Whatever. I’m gunna go drank sum burrs and luk at some nekkid chicks now.
My first sight of him almost caused me to faint with horror, as it did my cell mates. His head was rotting and the smell was beyond description. One could even smell his head above the normal stench that prevailed in the cells. He had a white burn scar running from what had one been his hairline down to his nose. His eyes were swollen and closed and the only sound squeezing out of his deformed and battered lips was an agonising moaning whimper. His poor body shook as though he had epilepsy. We did our best to comfort him and over a tortuous half-hour he painfully told us that his captors had brought him to Quatro, questioned him, beat him and poured boiling water on his head continuously until he had lost consciousness. When he awakened a few days later, the injury to his scalp had not been treated. Consequently, as we could see, the infection had putrefied into a rotting mess. (p.96)
With gym work-outs. My spouse asks
Fêtes marked by frosted gems whose flavors sing…
On April 14, 2012 Fuel Chicago will be hosting a Rummage Sale to continue our mission to raise funds for the Dominican Republic. We have raised about $2000 thus far with a goal of just over $10,000 by June. Please watch the video and reach out to us if you can help in any way. Thank you. Have a blessed day.
We have had many good conversations since the "dark side of the force" showed up early in our marriage. I think I am pretty good at seeing what is going on, but being a guy, I want to fix it all and just put it behind me/us. I know how to fix some things but I have to realize the fact that I am not supposed to "fix" everything. That is God's job!
Many people go for the less expensive option, the portable, gasoline powered generator in order to plug a few extension cords. It works just fine. The problem with a gas-powered generator, we discovered, is that in a widespread power outage GAS IS INACCESSIBLE BECAUSE IT REQUIRES POWER TO PUMP GAS.
MaryAnne Gilmartin currently manages Forest City Ratner Companies’ Commercial & Residential Development division, including the development of two of the company’s most prestigious new projects: the 1.6 million square foot New York Times Building in midtown Manhattan designed by Pritzker Prize winning architect Renzo Piano, and the Frank Gehry designed Beekman Residential project in lower Manhattan. Ms. Gilmartin has been responsible for the development of several major entertainment and commercial office projects. She led the development of the 42nd Street mixed-use project and the development of the Battery Park City retail complex.
Americans can only hope that Karzai's feared abandonment comes to pass. Too many American lives and dollars have been spent on the unconstitutional Afghan project already, especially given that the result has been to create a personal fiefdom for the Karzai family, which continues to enrich itself every day that the U.S. occupation and aid continue.
Jan 20 – Shahrizat files a RM100 mil suit against PKR Ampang MP Zuraidah Kamaruddin and strategic director Rafizi Ramli for defamation in connection with the NFCorp issue
This has been a friendly reminder from a fellow crock pot user.
The EDL does not swallow the Continental relativism and post-modernism which say that ‘all cultures are equal’. In any case, the relativists don’t really believe that anyway. Edward Said and George Galloway, for example, believed and believe that Arabic/Muslims cultures are superior to ‘the West’. Isn’t that a non-relativist judgement?
I am going to resume sharing my own work as means of sharing my art, and perhaps invoking someone else to a creative inspiration.
- and I felt horrible! The CD that was playing was one of my favorites; Science & Faith from the script. That’s not a bad thing at all, the problem was that I had the feeling I had to wake up and go to school. This, because the CD had functioned as my alarm clock for the past few weeks. The music used to give me such a wonderful feeling, and now it had all been ruined. I just couldn’t stand it, so ever since this morning I’ve been playing the CD to remind myself of how much it was NOT my alarm clock. Luckily, after 4 repeats, I can now finally listen to it while enjoying it as much as I used to. Because music of the The Script, is simply the best music in the world!
There’s confusion to this sensation
High levels of Vitamins and Native Oils combine for soft, smooth, touchable skin
I popped it into Nik Color Efex Pro and used the 'graduated medium density' filter over the sky, and also a little bit of the Nik 'Midnight' filter to add more contrast and colour interest.
In theory class I was biting into my hand and finger. Banging my head off the table. Checking phone even though I haven’t took my eyes off it. And, thinking of all these reasons they wouldn’t want to hire me.
The first step is to clearly define what you are afraid of or worried about. Write in down. Put in on paper. Half of your worries and fears will be solved the instant you can define them clearly by putting them on paper. What once seemed big in your mind will look small and insignificant on paper.
She likes to pretend she’s a mama, pushing the stroller, putting her baby to bed with a blanket, feeding us, cooking for us, and of course bossing us all around with that finger and babble we cannot understand. If we could understand it she would probably be in trouble.
“The man knew what he wanted and went out and got it! Walked into a jungle and comes out, the age of 21, and he’s rich!”—Willy Loman*
“There may be loan-level issues but there aren’t massive pattern and practice problems,” he said. “And even when there are potential loan-level issues, you have to look at state law because not all states require the same documents.”
It may not be the most traditional of mission statements but it's definatly something I want to work towards this year and something for me to live by and pass down to the boys.
Rocky IV was released in 1985, the same year as Stallone starred I Rambo: First Blood, Part II. He earned a reputation in the latter, which he denies, as a jingoistic Cold Warrior single-handedly defeating the red menace. I have often wonder why Rambo was pinned in such a way when Rocky had a far bigger case of it here.
Gordon Biersch is a national brewery chain that specializes in authentic, German-style beers.
Sony's fan base has rallied behind their injured company, defending them on forums and sharing any incremental news they can find about the beleaguered behemoth in hopes of inspiring other fans to keep their wits about them.
The low points for Chambers and Holland both came in January. For Chambers it was finding out that he would lose Junior Jake O’Brien, the team’s leading rebounder, for the remainder of the season to a foot injury he’d sustained on a New Year’s Eve loss to UMass.
Article 29
In closing, I would be remiss this evening if I did not express my love and eternal gratitude for my sweetheart and companion and the mother of our six children. Her devotion to motherhood has blessed me and our family beyond words of expression. She has been a marvelous mother, completely and happily devoting her life and her mission to her family. How grateful I am for Flora.
buried in the dustbin at the corner of the street
I came across an interesting blog post today that brought up a topic I have spent time thinking about but that I don’t hear mentioned much in prepperland…the reality of Bugging Out. Now I have to say up front that I don’t agree with some of the points made in that post – I find it hard to believe that anyone would bug out to the woods when there was a chance that would cost them their job or their family – but the points I do agree with are important enough to offer the link and write them down. So, here we go.
But not for vampires and corrupt Republicans it does.
Dianne and Lee decide to fly to Virginia where they encounter a city still reeling from the emotional impact of the shooting and distrustful of outsiders who won’t allow them to forget. Following leads withheld from the police and FBI, they quickly learn everything is not as it’s been reported in the news. The mysterious numbers are connected to even more crimes, the school shooter was not working alone, and he left behind a suicide note that simply read…I’m not finished yet! Lee and Dianne had somehow stumbled across the wizard behind the curtain, and the Knights weren’t in Kansas anymore. Now the group had a choice to make, return home and pass up a chance to clear their friend’s name, or put their very lives in danger by going toe to toe with an unimaginable fiend.
downthetubes: Are you working with digital art tools and which ones?
It may not be particularly surprising to Europeans that Americans are fat. You see them all the time on vacation in every country in Europe.
I think I handled it pretty well--it was nothing like putting her on the bus to preschool at age three. THAT I didn't handle so well. I fought off tears while obsessively watching the clock and checking that the phone worked for the next three hours. Or like that time this past February when I went to the kindergarten registration meeting and the "Welcome Class of 2024!" sign made me feel light-headed and faint. Today, though, I walked Kimmy to school and saw her into the classroom
I smiled as best I could, but even to me it felt as brittle as spun sugar.
Appearance (0-3 pts): Amber colored with ruby highlights. The head is off white. Three points.
We are looking for people, collectors anyone in Toronto and surrounding area that might have something in their collection that fits this nature. Examples of things already featured on the show include - executioners swords, jack the ripper knife, torture helmet, Houdini's handcuffs etc.
What was I going to do? What was baby-shower-cute, but also suited to the first grade pallet?
Denise: Go for it! If you want to be a writer then write. Rejections are a part of getting published. Pull up your big boy boots and step into the thick of it. If you don’t get rejected then no one is reading your work. Just remember… it will all be worth it in the end.
Hatred, carelessness you dare not claim as your own
I saved this one for last for a number of reasons. One of them is because it features my very good friend Jasmine Shea and it was her birthday on Wednesday and I hope this layout has reached her already. I wrote her a few words on why I think she is amazing. The main reason is because I got a chance to meet her and her family in January, and she has 4 beautiful children and it is just so obvious what a great mother she is and of course what a great father her husband is. I think of her often when I am having bad days..or long days with the kids , as she has 4 to look after as opposed to my 2. You know those days when you just seem to be going from day to night running around doing all sorts of stuff for everyone? Well I have many many days like that, but often I think of Jasmine who currently has 4 children at school and draw strength from that.
Yesterday, Arab WriterChick nominated my little blog for The Versatile Blogger Award! I am humbled and glad that she thought of me. Her poetry is full of heart and soul and is delicious candy for your mind. I hope you will take a moment to unplug from the world and let her words take you away…
I wanted to leave my personal baggage out of it, but I’m going to keep it real.
Creates stability in the pelvis; Reduces back pain; Reduces SI pain; Creates a center that is unshakeable; Improves posture and stability from the inside out.
but all they'd do was moan.
In a medium bowl, whisk together the flour, cocoa powder, baking powder and salt. In the bowl of a stand mixer fitted with the paddle attachment, cream together the butter and brown sugar on medium-high speed until light and fluffy, about 2 minutes. Beat in the egg until incorporated, scraping down the sides of the bowl as necessary. Blend in the vanilla. With the mixer on low speed, beat in about a third of the dry ingredients, followed by half of the buttermilk, beating each addition just until incorporated. Repeat so that all the buttermilk has been added and then mix in the final third of dry ingredients. Do not overbeat. Blend in the food coloring.
In the beginning, the hardest part was getting over the jet lag. They say it takes one day per every hour in the time difference – and they were right. (South Korea is 14-15 hours ahead of Chicago, by the way.) Despite being awake at odd hours it felt almost too easy to get back into a few old routines. Some were nice, like driving to the mall while listening to the radio or spending a weekend with my family. Other habits needed to be restricted, like eating CHEESE for every meal and watching reality TV. I wouldn’t want to further enforce the typical “American” stereotype I’ve fought against for the past 3.5 years.
I have a few of these things. One of these, as you may have deduced by now, is Borderlands. One of last year’s sleeper hits, Borderlands was a winning combination of first-person shooter and Diablo-esque loot whoring action RPG. A whole bunch of people bought it on its release, which is good. But how many of those people 1) finished it and 2) are still playing it now?
Susin Nielsen is a television writer and editor and has worked on many television series, including Degrassi, Degrassi Junior High, Ready or Not, Heartland, and Robson Arms.
I knew I’d have to cross the road to get to the elevator. The road curves a bit in front of the elevator. The lights around it would show where I was headed.
Reduce oven heat to 325-degrees.
I think a lot of us have employed auto run for these moments. Sit back, let your character do the work while you eat a sandwich, it makes perfect sense–until you drop a tomato on your lap. Or your dog tries to take a bite from it. Or your wife complains that you didn’t make HER a sandwich. Whatever the reason, you look away.
I think that's all...boy has it been a month or what?!
ピザ自体とても美味しく、私にとってはジャカルタで味わったピザの中では一番美味しかったです。値段に関しては、外国人を対象としたレストランの中では、平均的で、高くない値段と感じました。立地条件もよく、ジャカルタの中心街に位置しているので、とてもアクセスしやすいと思います。Luna Negraは、デートや女友達との外食などにもとても合うレストランだと思います。ジャカルタのゴールデン・トライアングルと呼ばれるオフィス街に位置しているため、月曜日から金曜日はビジネス関係の昼食や夕食に来るお客が多いのではと思います。ビジネスミーティングや、家族の食事会などもできそうなガラスに囲まれた個室もありました。夫と私は6歳と3歳になる娘2人、友人も同じ位の年齢の子供を連れていましたが、とても居心地が良かったですよ。ジャカルタに来て嬉しいのは、皆さんとても子供好きで親切な事ですね。
For without him I would be nothing, I'm so sorry that I don't post as much as some but to be honest, it seems there's a lot going on this time of year. I've been planting my garden and yesterday I finally took the much anticipated step of getting my annuals and hopefully have them in the ground soon..I love my flowers..Then we all have to mow occasionally, I put that mildly. I try and help my husband out with that too, since he still works on a job.. But I love being outside and enjoying all the beauty that God has graced us with.. It's such a beautiful time of year..
Although I can testify to there being greater effort in the second half, it was not reflected in the scoreline, with a further four goals being conceded. Kristian Hewitt had given us the lead from the spot. This was cancelled out by a Bishopstoke equaliser. Martyn Barnett and Ryan Hurst both scored to level the game at 2-2 and then 3-3, but as the game went on the pitch appeared to gradually increase in size, as we began to look more and more tired; a factor that was not helped by having to use both of our substitutes in the first-half, due to injuries to both Ben Rowe and Marc Judd.
Hello Bill,
Jesus reached maturity because He listened to no one but the Father. Yes, He listened to people’s pain and sorrow, and with compassion He healed them physically. But He also freed them from their inner demons so they might be made whole and clean. He’s about “rest,” not just healing and salvation.
Its tone of sound silent yet spoken
Tomorrow I must focus on cleaning the house and taking my machines in for a good cleaning!
I actually blew my nose into a pair of children's striped panties right about then. Don't worry. They were clean. I couldn't find a tissue.
When an environmental disaster in progress becomes a media circus and danger to the community Pacific Mercy Charge Nurse Erin Quinn calls for reinforcements. What she gets is Fire Captain Scott McKenna, a handsome incident commander who insists on doing everything by the book -even when that means refusing Erin entry into her own E.R. Tempers flare and sparks fly as these two battle it out, each trying to do their version of the right thing.
Plus something is really wrong with my mother again (she had agressive hormonal breastcancer a couple years ago, and some things are not going so well now...
16-20 Butter crisps
– Leila Mahfooz Barry
In 1999, I began searching the internet for answers and found the mercury militia, milk/wheat free diets, ABA, AIT, Pubmed, and Thinking in Pictures. Dr. Temple Grandin is the only one who has stayed, because: She could be my child, all grown up, as children tend to do. She WAS diagnosed autistic. She IS an adult. She DOES speak and work and care about kids with autism, hopefully more than in a monetary/fame sense. Alas, she only wrote 2 books at the time, and Thinking in Pictures literally became my bible. Later, Donna Williams Exposure Anxiety led me into new pastures.
Jerry Kennedy – Guitar
In our fecklessness, we passed the early time of the venture exchanging comments back and forth with the other participants: “Nice looking rubber” or “You wanna drag?”
In 2000 the eyes of the world turned to the Mansion when Texas Governor George W. Bush was elected President. As you’ll recall, it took several weeks to ascertain whether or not Bush actually won the election, but when the matter was decided, more or less, Bush turned the house over to his successor, the first Aggie-American Governor of Texas, the pretty boy with the professional skateboarder’s name and impervious helmet of hair, Rick Perry, who lives there still.
Chay plays with his children.
Marinade the chicken with all the ingredients except the honey. Pat dries the chicken skin and roast in preheated oven at 180 deg C for 80 minutes. Glaze the chicken with the honey and continue roasting for 10 minutes.
“That’s interesting,” I said.
KT: Will we see your work translated to Greek anytime soon? Fingers crossed!
When it was getting later we decided to do some karaoke and walked back to the Japanese district were we got an hour karaoke for 30 euro but since the system was so complicated we wasted like 30 minutes on just trying to make the damn machine work! Still we had a lot of fun and now we know how it works for next time! Around 20:45 we decided to slowly start going back to the station since Eivind and I had to travel back. We made a pit stop at a cake shop because Sazh and Jojo wanted some cake to take to their hotel room and we also made a stop at a bubble tea place. We then went to the station, waited for the train, said our goodbyes and started on our journey back. We were really dead when we got back home little after 0:00 but we still watched a movie and went to sleep
1. Say “Okay,” and then continue with your life.
Two and a half weeks ago the title race was effectively over because United raced eight points into the lead following City’s defeat to Arsenal and it looked like the Premier trophy was on its way to Old Trafford once again.
I'll say this for Cyrus Webb: he's ambitious. Though The WRITE Stuff hasn't yet aired, he's already planning a spinoff...in Nigeria.
I was still working hard for him, harder every week, just because I wanted him to be happy and I thought that if I worked harder, he’d realise how necessary I was to his business and he would change his mind about paying me, even a little bit.
It is fantastic, but subtle.
with them, and Sara for her hospitality. And thanks to all for making me feel
As ever, please do NOT post your answer, but do feel free to say if you have solved it and how long it took. Also, it is ok to leave fake/joke clues (but no real ones!). Solution on Monday!
And Lord I just had to call on you
It all began with a 1977 Supreme Court decision, where a judge, for reasons best known to him, interpreted the law relating to Bollywood music in a manner that effectively emasculated the rights of music composers and lyricists. His brother judge, known otherwise for standing up for the under-dog in language often reminiscent of "poetic" justice, remained largely silent (by his "verbose" standards).
This weekend was "spring cleaning" weekend. Or at least it was to me. I bet if you had asked the Attorney General on Friday morning, "Hey, Attorney General, what do you think your weekend will be termed?" He would have said, "I think it will be called college-basketball-and- driving-range-weekend." And we would have laughed and laughed. He would have been laughing at how fun his weekend sounded and how it would look cute on a bumper sticker and I would have been laughing at how simple-minded he looked when he was optimistic.
It was a dark and drizzly Tuesday night when Hoosier Beer Geek decided to visit Zing. And it is too bad, because the latest addition to Indy's small plates restaurant scene has some stellar outdoor seating at the corner of Indiana Avenue and West Street.
"Frank Luther (August 4, 1905 - November 16, 1980) was an American country music singer, songwriter and pianist.
A mixed aerial assault should work. Go for the enemy main base—you’ll want to take out as much economic and production infrastructure as possible. And don’t attack through the main entrance; hit the base from behind or from the side. Again, the Void Rays should be able to take out the Command Center, while the Carriers and Mothership deal with defenders. If you don’t like the idea of an air-only attack, bring in a Warp Prism and warp in ground units from Warp Gates. Stalkers will normally be most useful.
Have you priced those lil hummer's lately? I have...We went to the lumber yard...1x4's 8ft long (knots and dog legs included in price) $8.29 a PIECE! For my kitchen? it would cost me $84.00 and change just to line my kitchen ceiling again...that is more than 10% of the cost that I paid for my house! and that was utility grade lumber...not the nicer stuff!
Too often kindness is relegated to a random act performed only when we’re feeling good. But an even greater kindness (to ourselves and others) occurs when we reach out even when we aren’t feeling entirely whole. It’s not easy, and no one is perfect. But we’ve decided it’s not impossible to brighten the world one smile, one kind word, one blog post at a time. To that end, a few of us writers have established The Kindness Project, starting with a series of inspirational posts.
Our earthly mothers waiting, sleeplessly.
The Greens of Emerald and Jade
A big thank you to everyone for your comments on my last post. The 99 percent study was done by E. Mavis Hetherington, a big-wig in the stepfamily research scene. It was a SMALL sample of people, which is problematic, and as one commenter said, statistics are incredibly hard to get a handle on. I am always one to advocate that we are not the statistics we read about! I am also one to always be realistic about what we’re facing so that we can incorporate success measures into our families and lives on purpose. YOU are not a statistic. You are a human being living with a unique set of personalities that may or may not follow what others have done.
If it were making kids safer, maybe we could overlook how obtuse it is. But a 2008 study found that, in New Jersey at least — where little Megan Kanka, for whom the law is named, was murdered — the law showed no effect in reducing the number of sexual re-offenses or reducing the number of victims.
As they say in CB land, catch you on the flip flop . . .
(1600 AD to 1800 AD)
Where’s all the joy
The schools tried a variety of solutions, including replacing the Ten Commandments with a copy of the Declaration of Independence. This didn’t sit well with many in the community. On Jan. 11, 2011, a meeting was held with about 200 people, including pastors, and a short time later, the school board voted to reinstall the displays.
As of today, Facebook users now have the option to share their organ donor status on their timelines. In a post on the site, Facebook points out that there are 114,000 people currently awaiting transplants in the U.S. and millions around the world:
After a somewhat restful sleep, our morning was free before we headed to Deeside. We went down to Doctor's Cave, which is the portion of the beach we can go to. The students enjoyed snorkling the coral reefs and jumping on the party barge for a couple hours. After lunch, we literally set sail to Deeside, where we will be in church on Sunday and holding our VBS. It poured down rain for about 45 minutes of our hour drive. As you can see in the recap video, the roads are really bad. There is no drainage system so any amount of rain floods the streets. The goverment also doesn't see it necessary to repair the roads so all the roads have potholes that need to be avoided. Our driver was Pastor Vernon of Deeside. Mix that with wandering goats, dogs, people, carts, and other cars and a 15 mile drive can take a very long time.
You are all in breach of the Covenant, in breach of the Trust, in
Teaching English is easy for me. I use it all the time, and teaching comes fairly naturally, of course. Unlike teaching high school in America, 99% of my students are motivated, do their homework, and practice hard in class. Each student and each class has its own dynamics, especially with my childrens' classes. At times, it can be frustrating, but it's certainly more rewarding as I can see all my students' progress each week. The smaller class sizes (maximum 8, though I've never had a class over 7) make it easy to work one-on-one with the students.
“There’s all human bones outside your door, Mr. Wolfbane,” she shouted through the letter box.
He reported that all the poor innocent victims were stripped naked. His shock and horror to see this cannot be expressed in any known language.
3. Sometimes people not believing you because what you did to your friend or your close friend . feel upset dont you ? your aragument with word will not help you a lot . proof it with what you do . make they believe you with your body language . and keep it on your mind “Action speakers louder than words.”
It is a little more than just admiration, he has influenced many others like me.
So, hold onto these stories and BE the story. BE the living inspiration. And know that these stories were written by ONE person each. Don't let the ONE or TWO who enjoy making a sport of your consternation cause you to be less of a teacher to the other 95% of the students in your class. That isn't noble and it is beneath you.
Working Title: Planet Vacation
Anyway, this demonstrate the minimum that I’m comfortable with in not breaking the chain. For you and your daily tasks, it might be different.
Cheat On Me
Around the world, after water, tea is the second most popular beverage (look out for the seamless link) and Rupert Murdoch is perhaps the second most popular person we love to hate – after Simon Cowell. My caffeine come-down has been tough though not as tough as the last few days for Mr Murdoch. His occasionally obvious and deliberate dementia may have avoided some awkward questions at Leveson but it may have bitten him squarely on the bottom and could be blamed for new charges laid against his ability.
250 shark/tropical theme cupcakes for 30th anniversary at Drobny Law Offices.
The Man Who Came to Dinner – 0
Why “The Sandwich” you ask? See if you can see the sandwich pattern in the list below:
Decor:
The evidence for each of my statements is easy enough to find in any standard history of the Civil War or Reconstruction; but of course, my bringing it up is “revisionist.” And, of course, the neocons join the liberals in promoting the notion that any white male whose family has resided in the South more than a generation or two is the absolute scum of the earth. That notion is completely contrary to reason if you believe that people are individuals who deserve to be judged by the content of their character and not the color of their skin or the accent of their voice; but Lord, don’t let Martin Luther King, Jr.’s beliefs stand in the way of those who loudly sing his praises! And Christians should keep their religion to themselves if they aren’t willing to idolize the state, support foreign wars, and promote social conservatism!
Assets System - The Way To Protect Your Abode Or Playing
I sat in my seat and buckled my seat belt and began to people watch. The flight attendant came on over the intercom and stated where our destination was to be and how long it would take to get there. I glanced to my left and saw that the plane was pulling away from the departure gate…and then I looked up. People were still walking from the front of the plane to whatever seat it was that they wanted to sit in while carrying their bags. The bags still needed to be placed in the overhead bin storage containers and the flight attendant was still clamoring it seemed about the general stuff. I looked to my right and realized that for the first time ever, I had an entire row on an airplane to myself. The other two seats were empty and so before I turned my phone off, I sent this post to FaceBook.
to the relief of godly bliss promised in the afterlife;
This a beautifully dark little book. I often find myself sceptical about fairies - they seem so do-goody and Tinkerbell-esque, in the most part. In this case, however, Harrison has tapped into folklore and scary fairytales to present us with fairies that have bite. They steal children, commit mischief and cause mayhem on a whim. They are not friendly, or pretty - and I love them all the more for it. The fairy characters in this book truly leap from the pages.
I'm getting better but not completely healed and just pray that I continue to get back to my old self. Hopefully I will get some good pictures of Marley soon and post them.
In savings, I have enough to cover one month’s basic living expenses; not including the $1,000 per month medical payments we make. I do have some trickle income that comes in monthly from royalties and small gigs that I have maintained. My husband and I are both sending out resumes, preferably with him working full-time outside our home and me working part-time or full-time inside our home.
“If the guy you’re dating doesn’t seem to be completely into you, or you feel the need to start ‘figuring him out,’ please consider the glorious thought that he might just not be that into you. And then free yourself to go find someone that is.”
2 The Guardian on why India needs western supermarkets. Critics of the Indian government’s retail policy make five points. One, India doesn’t need foreign retailers, since homegrown companies and traditional markets are doing the job well. Two, independent stores will close, leading to job losses. Three, profits will go to foreigners. Four, there will be sterile homogeneity and Indian cities will look like cities anywhere else. And five, the government hasn’t built consensus.
Peter Schiff: I’d say it’s under-owned, it’s under-invested, people are so skeptical of it; everybody is expecting the price of gold to fall. Gold stocks are at record lows relative to the price of gold. There is basically no speculation going on, it’s all skepticism. Everybody is just waiting for the price to drop, everybody thinks it’s a bubble, and yet no one is really buying it.
There are a half dozen or so scenes in Freaks that will linger with you as aggressively as the revelation of what Victor has become in Se7en most notably, the climax, in which all sorts of deformed freaks crawl towards Hercules and Cleopatra with knives held in any way they are capable. You lose all sympathy for them subsequently because of their brutality. Hence, there are no good guys ultimately in the film.
I am sitting in the corner of my closet, laptop on my knees waiting for the house to implode over my head. Yesterday was quite seriously one of the most star-crossed days I’ve had in a long time, and I’m known for having some righteously strange ones.
-Take care of what you have!
For all the world
Many believe that if this been a mere condemnation of homosexuals, the writer would undoubtedly have used clearer language.
There were about 50 of us for the big dinner on the Saturday night, which was followed by a trip to the local pub where turns were taken by those of us who could sing a good story, and it turned out there were a few who could do it very well. I can’t sing, so I listened and wished that I could sing a story with as much aplomb!
When we hear about the issue with youth employment in the US we need only look at issues being faced in Japan as well:
15. Amori Di Alfredo (02:44)
His last album, 2009's BlaQKout with Kurupt, put its playful creativity up front and buried some pretty serious and hard won widom just beneath the surface, while The Book of David is an ostensibly more personal solo effort that puts its ugliest dirty laundry and hardest beats on prominent display while still being boatloads of infectious fun in its own right. I tend to prefer the former to the latter, but I respect both as formidable creative achievements.
5. Saranac Pomegranate Wheat
Ummm... I'd have to say blogging. It's the only thing I do on a regular enough basis. Although I also enjoy scrapbooking and yoga, and I'd do a lot more kayaking and rappelling if I had the time/water/money.
I am so very happy about this drug. The work of the Cystic Fibrosis Foundation is amazing and this drug is just proof that we are on the right path to finding a cure. I know that there are other drugs in the pipeline that may hold the key to helping Bennett one day in the future.
With apologies to Chuck Lorre, Richard Lewis and Two and a Half Men, this is a music funding video giving an example of bad preparation and bad spending vs having a well prepared music business plan and well designated spending.
Here’s the problem, America; we created the “terrorist” threat, whether real or imagined. It was our doing. These groups don’t exist because we have freedoms that they hate. They exist because we made them. How? By conquering nation after nation. By deposing democratically elected leader after democratically elected leader that happened not to agree with us. We created them by sapping the rest of the world dry. It’s a wonder the world at large HATES America; we are the Evil Empire, we just refuse to believe it because it hurts to think that, not only are our hands soaked in the blood of the innocent, but that we are bathing in their blood. And now, we’re not just content with hurting the innocent in foreign countries. Now, we are bringing it home. Now, we’re bringing it to your bus stops, your highways, your airports, and, one day, your homes.
Before I get into writing about me, I want to send out props to my Houston friends who rode in the MS150 – a two day ride from Houston to Austin. That’s not easy, but it’s for a noble cause. Maybe one day ….
I reluctantly follow him into the meeting room where we sit in silence for a few minutes
Secret Crafter Saturday Challenge: HERE Flowers and Border - My flower is on the outside and my border is on the inside so that should count
Brent Spiner, a good friend of Logan’s, shares writing credit. T makes sense. Yet again Data is a central part of the story just like every other TNG era film. Spiner’s creative hand makes much of data’s involvement wish fulfillment along similar lines to William Shatner in The Final Frontier. I will give Spiner some credit for understanding more characters than his own. Granted, many members of the cast were phoning in their performances here, but I do not think that was Spiner’s fault. All that said, his hammy singing of Irving Berlin, his double role as data and B4, and the clear attempt to copy the drama of Spock’s sacrifice in The Wrath of Khan I the climax all have Spiner’s ego written all over it. Data has always been my favorite character, but even I thought his role here is obnoxious.
1) Accuracy Rates Will Improve–the current accuracy rate is no predictor of future accuracy rates. With additional research and development and testing, there is no reason to believe that over time we cannot significantly improve the accuracy rates to screen for such common things as “elevated heart rate, eye movement, body temperature, facial patterns, and body language” to help us weed out friend from foe.
Well that's all my news, enjoy your week.
The Love Triangle. Because we all know that love and relationships are only complicated when a potential second suitor comes along, and apart from that, it’s all rainbows and good times and everyone gets along.
We are concentrating on what we do best....Decorating & Design and Home Inspirational pieces.
I’ve dealt with a lot of burn out in my life. When I was in my early twenties, after working one too many 60 hour work weeks, I quit my job and moved back to Sacramento. I was burnt out. I was so burnt out that before I quit, I got strep throat so badly that I was out for nearly 2 weeks. Back then I didn’t believe that my health was a reflection of what was going on in inside.
Over the next few holiday weeks we'll be posting our full texture recipes here on the blog and will show the new pack in use along with our classic textures!
Shift work & night work: increased risk of spontaneous abortion (Eskenazi et al., 1994)
Thanks to Just Jo of facebook for pointing this out.
We live in America – the whole fucking country has a weight problem (yes, the standards for obesity are higher for women then men - meaning men are more easily classified as obese – this is true), but be honest – go outside – and count the fat people.
Look. I’m offering something of incredible value to these people, no strings attached. Wow. Just put your name and email. (The example above isn’t too good. I don’t normally ask for phone numbers because of what I call “the email problem”)
The roofs that were sucked up from their homes in BedStuy is a seriously unbelievable result of the storm that apparently moved at 30 to 50 miles an hour across the area.
The Dark Knight of late night politics on TV3, Vincent has had more than his fair share of political scrapes in the past. His classes would be livened up by the numerous rows and debates that would be guaranteed par for the course.
debt and unemployment
Marilyn Volkman
Of human misery; we
She chokes on her pretty little heart
Snack: 6 dehydrated apple rings
things about my childhood that now make me laugh:
A month or so ago, I ran into our best local garden store for a quick Saturday purchase, and guess what they had; nicely weathered vintage crates filled with herbs, for…gulp…$100….style addicts note the grey wood and greige paint cobination to perfection….
A few photos from our Spring Break
How can the JMPD do this?” the man told The Citizen.
7.Fry for 2 mins and add the mashed lentil,close the lid simmer it for 15 mins.
Which is perhaps why I wasn't so much a fan of the novel Faithful Place. This was an Amazon recommendation, and I do like mysteries along the lines of Dan Brown and Agatha Christie, so I thought, why not try this one. It's about a police officer who hasn't had contact with his family for about 20 years when he was supposed to elope with his girlfriend, but she never showed and so he ran away on his own. His girlfriend's suitcase is found, and soon after her body, and he's drawn back into the world of lower class Dublin while trying to solve this case. The story was sort of interesting, but I had it figured out about half way through the book, and the way it was written wasn't terribly interesting. I'll give it a half recommendation, if this is your kind of book.
A High Court injunction obtained by an Anzac Ave landowner will not allow the Dunedin City Council to operate traffic lights at the Frederick St intersection with State Highway 88 near Forsyth Barr Stadium.
It came out in a large room that overlooked a pool into which a waterfall cascaded. There was a stream feeding into the pool and one flowing out. Ferros peered in and his scrutiny was rewarded by a glimpse of something glinting in the silt at the bottom of the pool. Sure enough, it was a key; this time, a golden one.
Ah, who am I kidding.
I use the prepackaged dough mix for the pizza crust – add 1-2 tablespoons of corn meal, mix as instructed on package.
He vowed that day, he told us, never to give a Thanksgiving sermon again that focused only on temporal blessings from the Lord.
1 x (324)Stayfree Cottony Soft Slim Non Wing = 4.70
He's the type of nerd that every girl likes. If you've seen Fanboys, you know what I mean. He's got “hot nerd” written all over him, with his completely non-buff body, and even his puberty-esque voice.
At any rate, today is the old dear’s birthday. Belle Montrose (b. Isabelle Donohue, 1886-1964) had a comedy act with her husband, singer and comedian Billy Allen, a.k.a Carroll Allen, a.k.a Carroll Abler. Their progeny, disc jockey, tv variety host and author Steve Allen was born in 1921; Billy died a year and a half later. Thenceforth, Belle and Steve lived with her extended family in Chicago, and she continued to perform in vaudeville with a succession of partners, one of whom was a teenage Milton Berle, who later called her the “funniest woman in vaudeville”. You can judge for yourself. The entirety of her act is quoted from memory by her son (who’d seen it hundreds of times) in his 1960 autobiography Mark It and Strike It. And she has roles in the Disney films The Absent Minded Professor (1961) and Son of Flubber (1963), both starring fellow former vaudevillian Fred MacMurray.
It is no surprise that the AA and Fire Service quickly pointed out that the concept of filling a jerry can of fuel to store on your property was both dangerous and ridiculous. Per litre petrol contains around 35 MJ (mega joules) of energy, which is the same as 8kg of TNT. Do you really want everyone in your area to have their sheds and garages rigged to go off with an explosive force that even Bruce Willis would run away from? Didn’t think so.
Anyway, it’s his turn to call…
The Race to the Top state competition is funded by the 2009 American Recovery and Reinvestment Act and is designed to reward states that are leading the way in comprehensive, coherent, statewide education reform across four key areas:
The idea with a maul of this size is to fill a canvas bag — called a Lewis bag — with ice and smack it with the hammer to crush the ice within. I actually blew out the seams of the first Lewis bag I used it on until I learned not to put my all into it. The ice can be merely cracked into several pieces or pounded into snow-like consistency, depending on how hard and how much it's smacked.
With the most amazing views you will defiantly feel like you are drinking on a luxury yacht, in the middle of the ocean. You will hear the waves crashing against the dock as the tide comes in. The refreshing smell of ocean breeze will relax you while you drink.
Wednesday continued in a similar vein to Tuesday. More Czech beer, more lovely Lambics and some exceptional UK cask. The Dark Star Hylder Blonde - a delicate, palate cleansing beer that danced delightfully like an elderflower angel on my tongue was divine. Two other elderflower beers were rather nice too - Thornbridge's Craven Silk and Liverpool Organic's Josephine Butler Elderflower Ale. The Salopian Shropshire Gold was a nice drop also.
After a week of long days at work (which culminated in me getting to shake hands with Supreme Court Justice Sotomayor), I looked forward to a quiet weekend at home with the family. Then I got the devastating news that a law school friend and former work colleague had lost his 35-year-old wife tragically and suddenly. They have two little boys under the age of 4. I was devastated for him and it also made me think about my own mortality and what would happen if one of us was gone from Charlie's life. I tried to distract myself with a grain-free baking experiment, but that failed miserably. I realized I needed to worry about perfecting it later and just spend the evening watching my little guy toddle around and babble to me. That's what was really important. As much as I value the quality of food that I feed my family, what is most important to me is the time I have with them.
Level 5: MP Cost: 8, Damage: 265%, Attacks up to 5 enemies.
Given that Batson was a former Paterson staffer, the contribution signaled loyalty more than policy. And Batson's been away from Atlantic Yards issues recently. That said, let's assume that Paterson might at least take a phone call from Batson about AY.
"Not only are the government's present policies on homosexuality irrational in themselves, but they are unreasonable in that they are grossly inconsistent with the fundamental precepts upon which this government is based...we may commence with the Declaration of Independence, and its affirmation , as an "inalienable right" that of the "pursuit of happiness". Surely a most fundamental, unobjectionable, and unexceptionable element in human happiness is the right to bestow affection upon and to receive affection from whom one wishes. Yet, upon pain of severe penalty, the government itself would abridge this right for the homosexual"
I love fall, the light changes here. It is very subtle to most people. Even the ones that live here.
*Packed with energy:* fruits provide you with much more energy to
“The mere idea of you. The longing here for you. You’ll never know, how slow the moments go, till I’m near to you,” I sang softly into Emma’s hair. Billie sounded way better of course, but the words felt too right not to say out loud.
Cut to 3 weeks later when all I can think of now is how badly I want lace bottoms…skirts, shorts…I don’t know if I’m desperate enough for a skort yet, but I’m getting there.
Supplies used: Canvas scrap, photo copied music, "antiqued"(Tim Holtz distress Ink-Vintage photo), Mod Podge, Ribbon, Velum Stickers-font wordsworth, black vinyl, Fiskars- Ultra Shape Express Journaling and Bracket Template, music note punch, Crop-a-dial.
hug
This is an interesting topic. One of the first times I heard about Network Marketing I passed up on it- because of what it would cost to build (in time and money, but mostly time). I also owned another business. But hey, who says you can’t multi-task?
The oceans vital role in limiting carbon dioxide levels in theair is now being reassessed by scientists aroung the world. Plankton are as important as plants and trees in the take-up of carbon dioxide.
This first one would have to be my favourite
77. Little boys singing to themselves happily and unselfconsciously at various times throughout the day
While dying, his executioners gambled for his clothing
Do you have dreams that you’ve long given up on? Dreams that you don’t dare revisit because of past disappointments and pain? Bring them back to the Master Designer (God) and ask Him about it. I truly believe that those who seek sincerely will find because “He is a rewarder of those who diligently seek Him.”
01 - Bounty Hunter 03:00
block
Gerald Kolpan
I know this is not my usual paper craft style, but I am putting this out here anyway. This Epic card was created with the Cricut Imagine and the Cricut Imagine JT cartridge. I also used an Imagine pre-loaded shape as the background mat. And in keeping with my theme of Imagine elements, I also printed the background paper from the JT cartridge.
Thanks for taking the time to read this post! I know it was a long one! And good luck to each and every one of you!
So here is the challenge, based totally on the Nick Bantock books.
Let me just say this about Burfict, dude is an absolute beast. He has incredible size, listed at 6-3 250 lbs. and displays the type of overall athleticism you would usually only find in players of much smaller stature. Burfict is explosive and can cover a lot of ground quickly. Last night’s game was a little hard to get a read on Burfict as he seems to be playing much more conservatively to avoid costly penalties that can have a negative impact on his team and his draft position. Luckilly, we already know Burfict has all the physical abilities in the world to succeed at the next level, however there are many issues he will need to correct to become a better overall player. Burfict has been labled as some what of a head hunter and dirty player who’s attentions go far beyond taking down the ball carrier. Due to this intense and aggresive style of play Burfict has been targeted many times by referees as this was in full effect last night. Vontaze was consistently targeted as the opossing team and referees were enticing and antagonizing Bufict all night waiting for him to slip up, and when he did they were there to slap him with some unwaranted personal foul penalties. This has affected Burfict’s play lately as he appears tentative and afraid to make a mistake, thus taking him away from his true playing style. In last night’s game it was apparent Burfict wasn’t hustling or playing with the same type of intensity that we have seen from him in the past, and while I agree that he tends to play a little out of control sometimes, the referees don’t need to target him as much as they have in the past few games. Burfict physical capabilities are striking, however he will need to play more within himself to avoid costly fines and suspensions that could come his way as he tends to lead with the crown of his helmet at times. Burfict is also usually a pretty good tackler as well, but his over-agressive nature sometimes takes him out of the play as he fails to break down quickly enough to get into tackling position. Burfict definitely has the strength to bring down ball carriers with just a shoulder or arm, however I would like to see him work on his tackling form to become a better overall linebacker and player. Burfict also needs to do a little better job reading his keys and trusting his eyes as he sometimes fails to diagnose the play quickly enough. One thing that has impressed me is how difficult he makes it for opposing players to take him out of the play, Burfict is incredibly slippery and hard to engage as he moves aroud and through trash effectively. I still need to see more of Burficts overall game to see what kind of player he can become in coverage as I haven’t seen enough film just yet to make an assumption of his skill-set in this area. Burfict has a ton of potential but comes with a lot of question marks, so the team who drafts him will need to be careful he doesn’t commit costly penalties and become a targeted player like Ndumukong Suh has become in the NFL.
Every piece was breathtaking and to top it off - the owners were so kind and gracious!
I was so excited to deliver the final product to them, the book is so elegant and there is something so wonderful about seeing your wedding photos away from the screen and in a book.
Zombie Lovers Unite!
And of course, the sickness that's been making its way around our elementary, found it's way into our home.
It’s a lovely experience, lasting nearly 3 1/2 hours all told. Because I made my appointment well in advance, the owner of the spa, Mouza, offers me a special deal: the Nourishing Aroma Honey Glow body scrub is free. My total for all my treatments is 45 OMR.
IMDb: 7.8/10 Rotten Tomatoes: 83% Metacritic: 68/100
Finally, if the past two years should have taught us anything, it is that we may not be able to keep our current insurance, even if we are happy with it. The CBO suggests that as many as 20 million workers could lose their employer-provided health insurance as a result of Obamacare. Instead, they will be dumped into government-run insurance exchanges. And, the recent dust-up over insurance coverage for contraceptives is a clear illustration of how the government will now be designing insurance plans for all of us. Regardless of how one feels about the contraceptive mandate itself, it is just the tip of the iceberg as government mandates tell employers what insurance they must provide, and tell us what insurance we must buy, even if that insurance is more expensive, contains benefits we don’t want, or violates our consciences.
I dug. They dug. Dirt got scooped. Dirt got flung. Almost onto the camera lens a few times....those girls have serious talons.
Although I'm not in grad classes through the University, I am participating in my biannual (teaching) book study. Tonight is the first meeting. It's on The Daily Five. I've heard nothing but good things about the book, and I'm really eager to learn more. Basically, it sounds like it's a system that teachers use to train their students to work independently on certain, valuable literacy tasks. While they work on their own, the teacher is free to meet with individual students. I have something similar already in place in my classroom, but I can always get better!
Making use of the royalty
- mv, west midlands uk, 17/2/2012 19:45
I know that I have a free will, and I know that I’m truly born again, just as very many really are. If I wanted to, I could live a willfully disobedient life and then go to Hell. But I choose to work out my salvation through fear and trembling (Paul’s words). And each day I have to overcome.
This is the 3rd week of day shift and I am nursing Day 4 of this horrid cold/flu/headcold, whatever you want to call it. I made a massive mistake of not increasing the intake of vitamins with the 'timezone switch'. So there, I am properly sick for the first time in 2 years. Hence, I dedicated my morning/afternoon/day really, into changing my layout. What do you think? I am quite happy with how the owls turned out. Hoot!
Nov. 18: Sovereign PAC, Reading, PA
﻿I was 21 when the Berlin Wall came down – was aggressively pulled down, really. All through my childhood and adolescence it had been the symbol of the Cold War and a physical embodiment of the lack of freedom for all of those on the wrong side. Those poor, trapped victims of Communism; we felt so sorry for them, we were so ecstatic about liberating them. (Even if we participated in spirit, only.)
I really can't stress how awesome this meal planning thing has been, I am so glad I started it!
The two greatest strengths of the film are the visuals and the location work. This was one of director Ronald Neame’s earliest efforts and he, along with cameraman Oswald Morris, takes turns at bathing the screen first in deep, moody shadow and then in bright sunlight. For an up and coming director Neame shows great skill in his handling of composition and framing too, drawing the eye to the pertinent and subtly altering the mood with clever placement of characters and objects. The location shooting in Tunisia adds an air of realism that’s a big asset and lends a greater sense of openness to the exterior work. So much for the positives; the weakness lies primarily in the script, as is so often the case. While I understand that the romance between Redfern and Anna is a necessary ingredient and provides the motivation for the hero to finally act decisively, it has to be said that it’s never a convincing one and, furthermore, slows the story too much in the middle. It leads to that old problem of a strong opening and climax held together by a slightly stodgy and flabby middle section. Of course, the fact that so much of this part of the story depends on the interaction between Trevor Howard and Anouk Aimee is a contributory factor too. Howard plays the role of Redfern with a slight stiffness, but in fairness I think that’s simply a part of the character and can’t really be taken as a criticism of the performance. The thing is he looked a good deal older than his years at that time and having him play off a teenage Anouk Aimee is a little disconcerting. Additionally, she was acting in only her first English language film and that does seem to have had an effect on her performance – her delivery is never natural and she looks vaguely uncomfortable throughout. Still, there are some fine supporting turns to shore matters up: Herbert Lom is first class as the main heavy, Miles Malleson downplays his comic side as the local policeman, and Wilfrid Hyde-White has a great little part as the slightly seedy pianist channeling Hoagy Carmichael.
2. Heat a bit of olive oil in a large sauté pan set over medium-high heat and swirl to coat. Add the patties to the pan so that they are not touching. Let cook about 4 minutes or until the first side is lightly browned. Carefully flip the patties with a spatula and let the second side cook until golden brown, about 3-4 minutes more. Repeat with the remaining patties, using additional olive oil if needed. Top each patty with a bit of shaved Parmesan, a poached egg, and season with salt and pepper to taste. Serve immediately.
A Flintstones Christmas Carol ... Boomerang ... 8 AM
(After about 25 minutes) Jeannie: "I'm still having a hard time with this. Just confessing."
-Fill a parchment cone with the chocolate and pipe a quarter-sized round of it onto the parchment-lined sheets.
Preheat oven to 350 degrees F or 180 degrees C and cut the potato wedges without peeling the skin.Blanch them in hot saline water.Mix in the spices ,salt and garlic,olive oil,lemon juice.Line atray with aluminium foil and layer the potatoes in it .Place it in the oven and bake for 15-20 minutes. Serve Crispy baked potato wedges with tomato ketchup!!
Just arrived, Isabelle petting a super runt calf!
Unfortunately I did not get to shake hands or take pictures with either Obama or Jimmy, but not many people can say they have seen the POTUS (President of the United States) in the flesh! AND, in other exciting news, Jimmy Fallon tweeted at me! I was probably more excited about this than I should have been, but how often does a celebrity tweet at you? Not very often. I also may be speaking on a local radio show tomorrow about the event!
As an added bonus, from the entries for this challenge, we will select a few layouts to "feature". One of the featured layouts will receive this beautiful La Blanche Victorian Swirl stamp from C'est Magnifique.
to mow or pull weeds for hogs and chickens.
The most alarming discovery, however, is that we found that you had direct relations with Mr. Chester Williams. This person is on the most wanted list in ten countries, and we have been tracking him down for quite a while.
Note: You can turn this side dish into an appetizer by wrapping each asparagus with ½ slice of prosciutto ham (cut lengthwise). Make sure the asparagus is completely cooled before you wrap them with prosciutto. Serve at room temperature.
What I want to do is build a frequency analyzer and match words to the patterns I made to see what pattern is being used.
A few years later, I bought a box of r.i.t. dye in this bright purple shade, grabbed my mom’s cast-iron canning pot and boiled me up a new dress!
As far as I'm aware it was only created late Wednesday or early on Thursday, so this is obviously fairly significant, even as a little morale booster. For anyone able and willing who has not yet done so, once more I would respectfully urge you to sign the petition in support of Mr Wilders here and donate to his fighting fund here. The only people who are going to be able to make any difference are the usually silent majority; the sort of people who, were they Dutch, would actually vote for Mr Wilders. According to Klein Verzet, online polls show something like 85-92% of Dutch people being against the prosecution of Wilders. Perhaps there is yet hope for common sense to prevail.
As I emerge blinking from the tunnel under the Thames, I realise I've allowed too much time for my journey. I've over-compensated for the usual slow crawl, that sees hundreds of cars filter through the toll booths into the tunnel like grains of sand through an egg-timer, and now I know I'll get there much too early.
these hopeful eyes scan far and wide for the faintest twinkle
Anyway, today was a day off as everyone was on strike, so this is just one of my everyday scruffy outfits, haha. Also, I'm starting to think this hat is surgically attached to my head, I swear I'm always wearing it!
Have no idea what happened in classes or at work today. Just a blur. This whole day is blur. The only thing I remember is last night…
2 1/2 cups water
Swift Forest Strider – 180 Darkmoon Tokens
Now, I think there is an important distinction to be made here: some parents proudly brag about how their teens aren't "rebellious," and what they really mean is that their children are obedient to their parents wishes (or, possibly more likely, are simply very good at hiding the aspects of their life that their parents would disapprove of). When I say that most unschoolers I know, myself included, don't or didn't "rebel" against our parents in our teen years, I don't mean it's because we fit the perfect-child model of some narrow-minded authoritarian-parenting suburbanite." July
WHEN HARRY MET MOLLY Kieran Kramer
Ladle batter onto large skillet or griddle and cook.
Starting in the 1950s, Americans eagerly built the planet’s largest public work: the 42,795-mile National System of Interstate and Defense Highways. Before the concrete was dry on the new roads, however, a specter began haunting them—the highway killer. He went by many names: the “Hitcher,” the “Freeway Killer,” the “Killer on the Road,” the “I-5 Strangler,” and the “Beltway Sniper.” Some of these criminals were imagined, but many were real. The nation’s murder rate shot up as its expressways were built. America became more violent and more mobile at the same time.
It leads to anger, backlash and frustration. Wagons are circled. Walls are put up. Damage is done that may take years to undo. I am not speaking theoretically here. This is the bitter experience of my past 48 hours.
In other words, Superman’s sense of right and wrong will have nothing to do with what the rest of us think. Superman is only worried about his fellow Supermen.
My philosophy, in essence, is the concept of man as a heroic being, with his own happiness as the moral purpose of his life, with productive achievement as his noblest activity, and reason as his only absolute.
What the hell are chicken balls? Rooster testicles? Honestly, how hard is it to find a pair of rooster balls? Yea, not easy.
so i guess nobody's lonely any more
“My khaki shorts. Not the black ones. You said they’re too long.”
That was the pattern from 2000, when NASA’s aeronautics program began its decline, to 2006, when it was restructured. Over the past decade, annual funding has fallen from more than $1 billion to around $550 million for fiscal 2013 and beyond (see charts). But even as the aeronautics budget shrank 40% from 2006 to 2011, the directorate’s workforce dropped just 4%, the NRC report says, noting the fixed portion of the budget for personnel is now 56%, and facilities maintenance another 14%. “The fixed cost for salaries and facilities severely limits the resources that can be effectively committed to flight research,” the report says.
“You guys run like rabbits if you want to,” the tracker challenged, “I’m seeing this through.”
Her oldest son was, until recently, might as well have been married to the anti-Christ. And I kinda ate it up.
Cesc says,”We don’t have to worry to much about them. We just have to play without fear and play our game. We showed them too much respect last season”
For our giveway today, we are giving ONE LUCKY winner a $100 Gift Certificate to Custom Crops! All you have to do is leave a comment here along w/the rest of the design team's blogs AND also leave a way for me to contact you! Each designer will be picking a finalist, then Emma will use random.org to pick the lucky winner out of those 17 names! So remember you have "17" chances to win! All you have to do is leave a comment on ALL blogs in this hop for more chances to win! The deadline is Sunday night at midnight! EASY PEASY!!! GOOD LUCK!:)
Run back in time to run forward in time, walk on eating your legs Sage?
Black Glutinous Rice, 1 cup
I stepped into a small grassy patch, near the back door. At the moment I put my foot in the grass, a large rabbit jumped out and startled me. She was only 2 feet from my shoe. She started licking herself, and was quite content with me watching her.
But here’s the kicker: I think ticks are totally awesome! Yes, by now you should know I’m a parasite nerd. It doesn’t help that the university I attend has resident parasitologists or that the research I’ve assisted with (mostly) involves parasites. It does help that we live in an area where there are several endemic species to look at and take pictures of, though, especially since the mild winter didn’t control the insect population very well (obviously it didn’t listen to Bob Barker’s spiel).
The Peaceful Assembly Bill, hurriedly introduced to try to stave off Bersih 3.0, has failed miserably. Its provisions are blatantly unjust and are routinely ignored.
refused
Good question. That's why I went to the panel. That's not what I got out of it.
Probably that susceptibility to colds requires a kind of weakened immune system. Dietary supplements and cold preventive remedies say, "boost your immune system so that you can ward off cold," and it's interesting, because if you want to diminish your cold symptoms, boosting elements of your immune system may be the last thing you want to do.
islands were so full of life that it's totally mind boggling … from tiny bugs to huge crocodiles, aninghas to manatees, fish, turtles, reptiles, raptors, shore birds, cats, deer … so much life. To my surprise, I thoroughly enjoyed the swamps and would love to go back to explore more in a kayak of my own.
Make the rest of the fritters in the same way.
9. Do you think your audience has a true sense of who you are based on your blog?
The UK is busily emptying its cupboard of the bit that’s left. The new QE round from Mervyn King marks the point at which I finally part company with Merv. I realise that I’ve just finished saying we need to ‘create’ some money for economic stimulation, but you can’t stimulate a fantasy. Well, you can – by taking drugs – but we’ve had enough fantasies and silly wing-and-prayer stuff like that already from the amateurs in Camerlot. Dave might get the odd inspired vision from a line now and then, but the next morning will only find him ‘suffering with a cold’.
Germans start with bier and Hvasska start with cigarettes.
In a certain sense, we do perhaps not, but only in a very certain sense: we do not know that Latin was spoken as we know we speak English, meaning in my case not only write and read and think in a language but also talk to people using that language and no other as we know that 2 and 2 are 4. But using common sense we do know we descend from predecessors who, south of certain borders, spoke Latin.
I'm off then, busy making a custom order for a mushroom decoration that needs finishing.
Host: It’s gonna cost Wall Street 127 billion bucks in cdo insurance too…
Those recently having exhibitions at the West Vancouver Museum could be asked to tell stories of the heydays of painting here: the work, the parties, the artist groups and the patrons. Let’s catch the vision from them while it is still possible. Like a relay race, we can receive the baton to pass on to future generations.
16 June NOTTINGHAM Sherwood Forest
**Repeat (X2)
Last weekend I had the pleasure of hosting a demo for a group of women from Windy Brushes, the IL chapter of the Society of Decorative Painters. Because autumn in IL is such a beautiful and colorful time of year, but also short-lived, I wanted to take advantage of the changing colors in the autumn leaves for the project I was demonstrating. Each student left that day with a set of 4 watercolor cards with matching envelopes. I selected Canson Monvant 140 lb. 5" x 7"cards, which come with matching envelopes. Below is a tutorial I put together for students who paid for the class, but could not stay. I thought I would share it with you here.
She spoke softly back. “I can see how much you hate this. But I have to do it.” Her lips raked against his skin and scruff. She drank in the fading scent of his aftershave. She wanted to do him right there on the interview room floor. She could sense that he wanted to do the same. “If it’s right, we’ll be together in the end.”
For a while now I have not been happy with some of my photo frames the white ones, I bought white because they were half the price of the black or brown ones but every time I looked at them I thought how out of place they looked so when I did my shopping this week I bought black paint and some paint brushes and last night I got off my ass and took them off the wall and started painting them.
Starting with the most depressing, slightly uncomfortable, connecting flight from Tampa to San Juan. But to rewind a bit, we (Colleen, Shelby, Harrison, & Mr. Bates) got upgraded to business class, giving us the free booze and more legroom which are also win-wins. But when the loud, unnatural shriek escaped a young girl on her way home we were all left with a bit of emotional rawness. Cries of “no”, “por que” and “mi papi” echoed throughout the cabin as the flight attendant encouraged those who thought they could help the girl who got news of her fathers death as she was set to head home on an AirTran flight.
There are funny moments, sad moments, and moments of extreme embarrassment, but what I love is the change that came over Della as the story progressed. From the unsure, self-concious girl, to the one who is a lot more confident, Della's story really is wonderful to read. My only negative is that I felt it ended quite abruptly, but overall it was a really sweet, lovely quick read. It would be great for summer reading!
It has been months since your death happened,
The canoe trip is not as we had imagined it - instead of us paddling yellow plastic things, a strong young lady is doing all the paddling in our creaking wooden canoe. But we weave through the mangroves, dappled in shadow and sunlight, lotus-seated in a spiritual silence, only the plash of the paddle, the soft chirruping call of some waterbirds and the ripping roar of the long-tail boats... E@L sits up front and holds a contemplative buddha pose, thumb to middle fingers on his knees, eyes closed, as his canoe returns across the river to the restaurant/canoe berth.
I think you are making a mistake by not endorsing Big Society.
We picked the location and dates pretty effortlessly. Now, if we could just decide on a damn resort we;d be golden. We visted a travel agent and she recommended three popular sites. My friend then went home and researched what seemed like 450 more. For some reason, she can’t seem to make up her mind on a place.
The only way I would have painted these particular hot pink figures with dark hair is if I wanted to go with a punk/goth look. I then would have added colored streaks to the hair and instead of red hair as the alternative I would have done white hair. Additionally I would have given them tattoos and body paint and/or heavy makeup. Oh the choices!
All of today..I sat in class daydreaming about the food that would be before me in a mere few hours..imagining all the taste..texture..smell..feel..*exhales*
Lovers of Soul-HipHop-Pop music and more, I hope you'll get served!
Nahoon to Nxarhuni;
We had a fun and sugar-filled Valentine's Day. Sarah showed up at 6:30 a.m. with Krispy Kreme for everyone. Now that is true love because she isn't a morning girl! We had doughnuts and waffles and Valentine's cards all around. Then last night we had a fun fondue night for dinner.
I read a book when I was young
Two other deputies received suspensions.
In a word
Getting to see the backcountry of the Everglades is an opportunity unlike anything else. What people see from the more popular northern Everglades is only scratching the surface of the entire park. The trails and mangroves weave into an intricate network of life, sustained by the rain that was prevalent our entire trip. Looking back, we were blessed to see it in the rain. It’s like seeing a factory at work. The Everglades has been plagued and decimated in recent decades by development and urban change, but seeing how the rain sustains the life and the river brought a brand new perspective on the landscape.
I have a friend who got a job at the electric company. They pay him $12.00 an hour to go to school for training, then he does 15 hours a week as an apprentice. When everything is done he will make $20.00 an hour. Oh yeah; and he won't have debt. The best thing in today's world is to find a vocation, train yourself, and get experience.
2010.08.05 Afghanistan Kunduz 7 13 A Fedayeen suicide bomber murders seven local police.
Factor S no spotting ?
Anwaar: I hear footsteps!
You would be horrified if you read all the messages I get on Facebook of people swearing at me, calling me a traitor, a disgrace to all black people in South Africa and that whites are paying me to blog my views.
I'm sorry, but I want to go to whoever came up with that and knock them upside the head. If I could click my heels three times and be in Florida and wave my magic wand and have tickets appear, this might make the tinniest bit of sense. If I could be at the game, than I would. I can't however, WHICH IS WHY I AM WATCHING IT ON TV!
Based on the book of Michael Lewis (2003), which is about what Billy Beans and his baseball team Oakland Athletics accomplished during 2002 season.
A White-throated Sparrow (sorry for the blurriness; he was back behind a lot of underbrush and just wouldn't sit still) along the Walking Trail.
“Just a cigarette.”
In an interview with ABC News’ Robin Roberts, the president described his thought process as an “evolution” that led him to this place, based on conversations with his own staff members, openly gay and lesbian service members, and conversations with his wife and own daughters.
Can we dignify this approach by calling it medicine? Or, is it more accurately described as a form of sorcery? The sole reliance on Pharmaceuticals reveals quite a lot about the agenda underpinning modern medical practice. The Greek word Pharmakon has the following meanings: ”drug, poison, potion, charm, spell, enchantment,” and indeed, pharmaceutical-driven medicine serves the Pharmaceutical Industry’s ultimate agenda: throw as many expensive pills as possible at the problem to make as much profit as is possible. (if you can do this while generating the illusion that you are actually “treating” disease with poisonous potions, you have succeeded in casting the right spell).
I just want to end with saying:
5/2/12
a good rehearsal so I can
What kind of grandmother allows this, when she is already caring for her daughter and her 6 grandchildren within her home?
This peasant dress was a possible Easter dress for Miss T... the same colors as her above outfit. I just wasn't sure if I liked the body fabric so I went with Plan B. BUT, I do love this dress. I found the free pattern on fabric.com.
Anyway. You know my holiday was all about the food.
This riveting new detail emerged on June 20, 2011, and completely validated what I had said in the China's October Surprise article series since November 2010.
And, last but by no means least, Maggie arrived with five cards to show all in one go. I think, from her posting there was perhaps was a sixth but I could only see five images - here. They're all lovely, I have some of the Debbi Moore Art Deco ladies languishing somewhere waiting to be used up too - must do that as they're really elegant. Also, Maggie brought a very pretty card, coloured with Pro Markers - love the roses Maggie, as well as some cards that look almost as if they're made up of tiny jewels. Really lovely! Quick edit: Maggie has uploaded the sixth card - and very pretty it is too Maggie!
In a week that encompassed many emotions, we completed Years 1, 3, 5 and 7 in great style. As an unashamedly proud mother, I will forewarn all, that I will continue to use this blog as my very own brag book.
this cute girl, jacy ceccarelli, is the owner, with the dubbed title of a scarfiologist!
Oh, my God delights in a humble, loving servant. A woman of God who adores Him from sun up to sun down. Start the process right now. Get renewed and refined, so that you are ready to be acceptable in the kingdom of Heaven. Glory to God! Lord, thank you for making me a precious jewel of your master plan. Thank you for blessing my womb with fruit to do your will and not mine. Thank you Lord, for allowing me to be transformed into a beautiful butterfly full of blessings and love to all I cross paths with. Thank you Lord, for allowing me to serve you for what price have I paid to deserve such an honor?
Or, and this for me is the final test, I ask my inner voice to tell me whether I should be listening to a certain channel or not. I’m not asking my mind because my mind is tainted by vasanas and transferences, biases and judgments. I’m asking my soul, if you will. I usually get back a non-verbal positive or negative nudge And I accept that as the truest indicator. On the basis of it, I decide which messages I prefer and which I do not.
Mostly I answer "no" to the comments about sport and how all the boys must be "so" into it..........because on the whole my lads aren't like that.
Michelle also asked about crochet hook sizes and what do all the letters mean. In Australia we use metric measurements for our hooks and needles and I found this simple conversion chart which I hope helps.
Read Part II tomorrow where Bourgeois Nerd and GayProf discuss secret blog identities, social phobias, and gay marriage. Plus, GayProf will show you how to get coffee rings out of your antique furniture!
The whole time I'm in A&E I explain I have private health care and any time they think it appropriate I can be whipped over to them.
The sun is relentless in burning through
I immediately thought of the Fuzzy Pumper Barber Shop that my sister Margie gave Hunter one Christmas. Made by Play-Doh, it came with bald headed plastic people that sat on barber chairs stuffed with Play-Doh. A quick turn of the crank produced strands of Play-Doh hair that could then be cut and styled.
“She looked okay,” Roy assured her.
As a result, Mr Johnson banned all GLA staff from using such cards. His aides say he has never used one himself. They state he has only ever bought economy-class tickets as Mayor, though he has occasionally been upgraded and received a ‘small number’ of free flights. They say he uses few taxis and prefers to use his bicycle. An official said Mr Johnson rarely dines at public expense and publishes all details of such events.
I spent another evening in the darkroom today, so I decided to use the opportunity to take some photos as I hadn’t done any up to then. I’m happy with the shots.
I'm so glad it's almost the weekend!
That is how we met the boxer, Hamburgler and some other girl dressed as something obscure that I didn't care about.
It clearly says in 2 Chronicles that the remedy to the pains of a nation, is simply to cling to God’s truth; to pray and humbly ask for his forgiveness of our sins and for his protection and sustenance of our nation. It also tells us quite clearly what will happen if we don’t:
In total I drove around 1700 km (1050 miles) with an average consumption of 11 liter/100 km (21 mpg). Not stunning, but not bad either considering that I saw 120 km/h (75 mph) on the speedo for hours on end, broke up only by spirited driving on twisty roads.
12 Departure 4:49
As usual, everyone attacked the challenge from a variety of directions. There was the obligatory and totally inappropriate handjob reference:
MacDonald seeks to build a lasting foundation for Christian marriages by constructing a ‘ground-up’ book on marriage. He begins by discussion ‘romance’, which he considers to be the very practical basics of liking the other person, touching on kindness and regard. After this he moves on to the nuts and bolts of ‘sharing’ with one another, touching on communication and conflict. His third section deals with the concept of developing the other person’s gifts through serving one another. His final chapter is on the physicality of marriage (i.e., sex). There is nothing wrong with MacDonald’s structure in broad terms; it is his execution that is inadequate.
$1.00 off any Citracal
True Colors
Horslips- The Man Who Built America
To Deleuze, the plain of immanence is something that must be actively constructed and does not per-exist. It is something that can emerge through the on-going development on multiple bodies without organs, or in other words, bodies such as art, politics, sex, and science that have unlimited potential for expansion, development, and exploration. It is through their overlapping and co-existence that would create what Deleuze refers to as a “multiplicity of immanence” (Deleuze and Guitarri, 157). Whether the bodies are the correct ones, if a correct one even exists, is irrelevant. As he puts in in the very beginning of the chapter, a body without organs is already “accomplished the moment you undertake it” (Deleuze and Guattari, 149).
I'm a bit bummed by the bottom 2 just because they didn't turn out as dark as I had hoped and I ran out of time and motivation by the end to get it done. The teacher is allowing us to redo one to submit for a better grade if we want. I haven't even seen my grade but just because it bugs me I might try to redo the bottom one.
‘Sure I did. I was just distracted.’
Blog Tours.
Media should be neutral
i had my first visit to a plastic surgeon that day. while i was in the room waiting i did a quick blog post about being able to fit in a paper gown. i have three of my real life friends receive my blogs via email instantly when i post. i did this because 1. i wanted to share my journey with these people specifically 2. i often called on these 3 for support and i felt instead of trying to re-explain everything it was just easier for them to see my blog and get an insider’s view to my mind and struggles and 3. i trusted them to read this and handle the information here appropriately. so…i hit send on my phone, the blog goes to 3 emails and within minutes one of the three recipients responds back to me and COPIES in the email 3 other people. one is someone who i was trying to date, as normal/chubby girl, at the time; another was someone i only socialize with at her house for parties; and the third was a social acquaintance who is really not that friendly to me and when i try to be friendly to her in social situations because of our mutual friends -- she responds kind of unfriendly. oh…but it gets better…when someone gets your blog post in email there is a link to your blog at the bottom of your email.
There is not much I can elaborate on this carrot cake oatmeal version. You can add more or less of the spices, more or less nuts, more or less raisins etc. This is a very versatile recipe so go ahead and get creative.
Adam also expressed he suffered a minor injury after falling off stage in rehearsals. While I respect that, you cannot/shouldn’t use that as a form of excuse in the way he presented it.
And sometimes it is extremely helpful to ask a local. They may know about unpublished, local sources that are difficult to access or have other "tricks" up their sleeve based upon years of experience with local families.
Sandy Koufax - Coney Island Parkviews
Nurse Duckett has urgent news about Dunbar:
I asked him a few questions about pain medication and such and he said it was perfectly normal to still be on pain medications at this point after surgery and gave me a refill prescription. I hope I can get off the pain medication soon but I also know they are important to the healing process and the medication he has me on is a fairly low dose and I’m not taking the higher end pain killers any more, so that’s good. He said that foot surgery is really painful (it is) and most people stay on the pain medication for awhile. The downside to this is that as long as I am on this medication, I can’t drive.
I really need all of you to come help me paint. THANK you so much :D I appreciate it - really I do. ^^
I know that June is still another month away ...
Add our Touch Twin & More Challenges button to your blog.
It’s free admission and is for everyone except, well me. Friday and Saturday night really belong to the Jr. high/high school kids, Saturday morning is for the kiddies to come out and race their toads and do a little face painting, Saturday afternoon and Sunday are for the *ahem* old folks and those into crafts, and the music every year is heavily influenced by the country genre. Of which I’m not a big fan. Plus every year without fail, it rains Toad Suck Daze weekend. Needless to say I haven’t been since high school.
However, Rosa Luxemburg probably didn’t have music on her mind. Of Jewish descent, she was brought up in Poland and from around age 15 was involved in left-wing politics. After fomenting a general strike, she fled for Switzerland at 18 (the other organisers were executed) and then settled in Germany. A prime mover in the Social Democratic Party (SDP), she was well known for her words, both written and orated. Often imprisoned, she predicted the forthcoming First World War and argued that workers should rise in a general strike to prevent it. When war came, the SDP struck a no-strike deal; Luxemburg organised anti-war demonstrations and split from them to form Die Internationale, which evolved into the Spartacist League. She contributed to illegal anti-war pamphlets, was imprisoned again and following her 1918 release was seized by Germany’s Freikorps and shot. Her body was thrown in a Berlin canal.
Nessie was suppose to have her own water garden this year - that's not going to happen, so instead she's guarding pots of sage, rosemary and jalapeno peppers. I use the jalapeno peppers to make non-toxic insect spray for the vegetable plants later in the summer.
In Switzerland, an immigrant group based in Bern said it wants the emblematic white cross to be removed from the Swiss national flag because as a Christian symbol it “no longer corresponds to today’s multicultural Switzerland.” Further, leading Islamic groups in the country announced that they want to establish a “parallel parliament” so that all of the country’s Muslims can “speak with one voice.” Based in Basel, the new parliament would straightforwardly operate according to Islamic Sharia law.
Q. What have been major achievements of PurpleLeap in past five years?
Tax exemptions?
Here are the photos of our sweet journey...
We must not allow this coalition government to turn the tide back to the days when it was acceptable, through ignorance and fear, for people with a different religion, culture or skin colour to be scapegoated and treated as inferior or outsiders.
But when Benson stumbles upon the school’s real secret, he realizes that playing by the rules could spell a fate worse than death, and that escape—his only real hope for survival—may be impossible.
Scrape. Click. Rustle. SHIT!
We've all encountered these people at least once it our lives. Same classic lines: "Oh you did 'Xyz?' Well I did 'Xyz' abroad, you know the quality there is so much better" or "Oh I also got 'Blarg', looks like you got the cheep one though. I got the deluxe edition". We get it, your an amazing guy with more time and money to spend than the average Joe. It's cool, don't really care though. I do care when you try and make your mediocre crap sound like it's equal or greater to other peoples achievements that took more hard work than what you have in your body.
Michelle does such beautiful sketches and painting. You can see more of her work in her Etsy Shop,
But that wasn't the weird part.
Published by: Penguin Books
The truth of the matter is we have decided to…
Some, including grandfather, call this belief in the “forty days” a superstition, but Baco is stubborn and Natalia knows better than to argue. Her thoughts turn back to her grandfather and the stories he told her:
In contrast, Hanan Ashrawi, a senior member of the Palestine Liberation Organisation, welcomed the EU statement as “politically responsible.”
I follow Ree's blog, The Pioneer Woman.I have been following her for some time now. I love her photography and hold out hope that some day when I grow up I can make photos that are as gorgeous as hers are. Some of it is her photo editing program, as she will tell you herself. I don't have the same program, but do have an editing program and am learning how to make my photos look better. She is a self taught photographer. And, she's very good.
This past Christmas I got a panini maker in a Yankee Swap that happens every year. If you have never had a Yankee Swap, consider doing it with your family next Christmas. It is so much fun and everyone ends up having such a nice time AND you normally get some pretty awesome loot! Anyways, so because I got this awesome panini maker I wanted to try it out. I am a BIG sandwich girl, I love having sandwiches. There are just infinite possibilities as to what kind you can have (thanks for my new “sandwiches” cookbook that you got me for my birthday Mom!).
Over the years I sought private counseling on several more occasions. I also called the national suicide hotline (1-800-784-2433) and counselors there talked me through some really tough nights. If you are suffering, whatever you do, do not buy into the stigma that to need help is a sign of weakness. I'm telling you that to acknowledge you need help and to seek it out takes a tremendous amount of strength. None of us are perfect and we aren't always equipped to deal with the stress and trauma that life often dumps upon us.
Lastly, probably one of the most important things I could say, is smile. I know it seems like such a simple task, but some days, even though they could be few and far between, are good. Some days aren’t quite so tough, or rather, parts of some days aren’t as tough. Smile during those times. Though it may not seem like it, you are so awesome. You’re facing a level of pain that few people can even imagine, and best of all, you’re getting through it. You’re not letting it tear you down. Yes, lots of days are hard, but you’re fighting. That counts. Rather than sitting on the floor feeling sad that you can’t do things as well as other kids, you’re standing there trying to figure out how you can do it in your own way. It may not be perfect, but guess what? It doesn’t have to be. All that matters is that you’re walking through the fire that’s your life, but instead of standing around and letting the flames consume you, you’re running straight into the flames and that, my friend, is so freaking awesome!
Last week, I received a letter, confirming that there was cancer in my removed uterus.
A rabidly liberal friend of mine in Vancouver sends her son to a French-immersion school. I took this as the usual liberal desire to expose children to any culture other than their own, their child's actual education be damned. Turns out I was wrong. The real reason, she admitted to me, is that the English schools are so overwhelmingly Chinese, the only way to avoid being a minority in one's own country (and language) is to send them to French schools!
Egads.
F: The one I wanted, I have found
i would have snapped a photo but i was too busy trying not to vomit.
"This area requires full attention regardless of whether you are walking or driving," he said. "...all the distractions for drivers and walkers, looking both ways, knowing you must move when the opening allows, not wanting to wait another light or two, adds to the danger.
The 5K is tomorrow, we’ll see how it goes!
I enjoy reading what Profesor Anonimo writes in his blog, but I have to admit, it sounds hard to do for someone like me to do. I just don’t think I could pull it off. I could maybe do a little story here or there, but not as my principal method. I really don’t think the wacky stories are the key component per se; they’re just one of various means to an end. The key is creating an engaging immersion experience through comprehensible input. We each have to find that way to create a target language i + 1 environment that Stephen Krashen describes and that captures students’ attention. One of the reasons that TPRS is appealing is that, when it is done well, is engaging to students.
I recently happened to stumble upon a newly created blog named, THE 3000 BOER FARMER "GENOCIDE" MYTH. The heading of the latest addition, dated 21-02-2011, and posted by “The Rooster”, simply reads, “The proof (19/02/2011)”.
Happy New Year's Eve, friends!! I can't believe Christmas has passed and it is now almost 2011?! I packed up all the decorations yesterday (except for disassembling the tree, that's Mr. Sugarplum's job...hopefully it's gone by Valentine's Day!), and I love how clean and minimal everything looks! I'm working on a little Winter decor, and will show you soon.
From the outside, it looks like a single school, with one main door, one security guard, one principal greeting students.
Personally, I have a nice ESV single-column reference Bible, and have come to enjoy using it in spite of its rather clumsy and archaic translation. And I doubt that the changes I have seen so far are going to make a whole lot of difference in this translation. It’s still rather clumsy and archaic. But it’s still not bad. Will these changes affect the perceived stability and solid reputation of the ESV? Well, I guess that depends on how they are perceived.
delivery teams through architecture, design and build in the capacity of a technology subject
I do think that there is an overemphasis in much of modern fiction on creating “likable” characters who “bond” with readers. I’m not sure that it’s so important that they be likable as it is that they be compelling.
"Meaning, rather, that one must pass through knowledge and arrive at simplicity."
Hoo boy, apple wine with a vinegar start and chlorine finish. Now that's a Lenten sacrifice!
Like all was written in stone by Pat.
Neil: Traveled.
Lemley said that he's seen estimates on the number of suits filed by non-practicing entities that range wildly, from 2% to 50% of all patent litigation. In addition, many struggle even to define what makes a so-called "patent troll" that acquires patents to use in court, and what makes a legitimate non-practicing entity.
On North Street, which will be closed to traffic, Howard Fink will demonstrate how to fold extraordinary paper airplanes and judge the best planes made by children and adults.
The hostess might pop over to give you a warm welcome, remember you have visited before and help with a cocktail selection. The Fragolino, a blend of Prosecco, fresh strawberry puree and Aperol is a no-brainer choice right now when California is producing some of the best strawberries you could ever hope to taste. So vivid is the red colour of the drink that arrives and so fragrant is the sweet taste, tempered only slightly by the bitter Aperol, that drinking it (impossible slowly) is akin to being a pink-dressed little girl in a candy shop. If you are looking for sophistication more befitting your age, you might try one of the more grown-up sounding choices, but then maybe you won't have as much unabashed fun drinking it.
I wrote this last week but never published..oops! Here you go!
First, I was impressed with a few of the one-liners:
According to a study involving doctors at Rhode Island Hospital, between May 2009 and November 2010, six patients were admitted to the emergency room there because of wire bristle ingestion. These patients came in complaining of abdominal pain and painful swallowing. They all had just eaten grilled meat. CT scan and x-ray results showed that there were wires in the abdomens and throats of the patients. The doctors determined that these were the grill brush bristles that had come off and gotten stuck in the meat. The study’s lead author, radiologist David Grand, says they don’t know if this is a widespread problem. He is, however, calling for more research.
Sophie Kinsella
This month I am very pleased to introduce you to Cindy, the owner, author ... and chef-extraordinaire ... of Vegetarian Mamma. Cindy and her husband grew up eating meat but decided to make the switch to a vegetarian diet about 8 years ago. Their children have been raised vegetarian but since Cindy's youngest son has allergies to peanuts, tree nuts, gluten, soy and dairy, they focus more on vegan foods. They are interested in whole organic non-GMO products which are free of artificial flavors & colors. And they've recently taken an interest in adding more raw dishes to their diet.
* Individual ability only becomes a deciding factor when the funding is equal.
The attackers fled with the TV and PC's only.
Here we go with another round of colds. Tinleigh has a very gunky cough and I am fearful she’ll get rsv again.
Finally for today, I'd like to say thank you to Nicole for doing a very sweet blogpost on me and my crazy quilting. You can read Nicole's post at her Beadwright blog.
Abdul Ariffahmi, 35, who is also the chief executive officer of Kelantan Mentri Besar Incorporated (PMBK), was asked to comment on this issue after talk emerged that Nik Abdul Aziz had accepted a RM65,000 sponsorship to perform the Haj from Nov 18.
Anne
Humankind has a lot to answer for.
Tell John I need to see him.
